STEM  EDUCATION  BEFORE  HIGH  SCHOOL:

SHAPING  OUR  FUTURE  SCIENCE,  TECHNOLOGY,

ENGINEERING  AND  MATH  LEADERS  OF

TOMORROW  BY  INSPIRING

OUR  CHILDREN  TODAY

FIELD  HEARING

BEFORE THE

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND

TECHNOLOGY

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS

SECOND  SESSION

MAY  12,  2008

Serial No. 110–101

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology

(

Available  via  the  World  Wide  Web:  http://www.science.house.gov

42–122PS

WASHINGTON  : 

2008

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

COMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE  AND  TECHNOLOGY

HON.  BART  GORDON,  Tennessee,  Chairman

JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California
MARK  UDALL,  Colorado
DAVID  WU,  Oregon
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
NICK  LAMPSON,  Texas
GABRIELLE  GIFFORDS,  Arizona
JERRY  MCNERNEY,  California
LAURA  RICHARDSON,  California
PAUL  KANJORSKI,  Pennsylvania
DARLENE  HOOLEY,  Oregon
STEVEN  R.  ROTHMAN,  New  Jersey
JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
MIKE  ROSS,  Arkansas
BEN  CHANDLER,  Kentucky
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
CHARLIE  MELANCON,  Louisiana
BARON  P.  HILL,  Indiana
HARRY  E.  MITCHELL,  Arizona
CHARLES  A.  WILSON,  Ohio

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas
F.  JAMES  SENSENBRENNER  JR.,

Wisconsin

LAMAR  S.  SMITH,  Texas
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
TOM  FEENEY,  Florida
RANDY  NEUGEBAUER,  Texas
BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina
DAVID  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas
MARIO  DIAZ-BALART,  Florida
PHIL  GINGREY,  Georgia
BRIAN  P.  BILBRAY,  California
ADRIAN  SMITH,  Nebraska
PAUL  C.  BROUN,  Georgia
VACANCY

(II)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

C O N T E N T S

May  12,  2008

Witness List .............................................................................................................
Hearing Charter ......................................................................................................

Opening  Statements

Statement  by  Representative  Bart  Gordon,  Chairman,  Committee  on  Science
and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives ...............................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Statement  by  Representative  Ralph  M.  Hall,  Minority  Ranking  Member,
Committee on Science and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives .........
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Statement  by  Representative  Mike  Ross,  Member,  Committee  on  Science
and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives ...............................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................

Witnesses:

Dr.  Cora  B.  Marrett,  Assistant  Director,  Directorate  for  Education  and

Human Resources, National Science Foundation (NSF)

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Mr. James Henry Russell, Superintendent of Schools, Texarkana Independent

School District, Texarkana, Texas

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Dr. Rosanne Stripling, Provost and Vice President for Academic Affairs, Texas

A&M University–Texarkana, Texarkana, Texas

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................

Mr. Mike Leherr, Plant Manager, Alcoa–Texarkana, Texarkana, Texas

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Mr.  David  Smedley,  Science  Educator,  North  Heights  Junior  High  School,

Texarkana, Arkansas

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................

Discussion .................................................................................................................

(III)

Page
2
3

10
11

8
10

12
14

15
17
21

22
24
28

30
31

37
38
39

40
42
44

46

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

STEM  EDUCATION  BEFORE  HIGH  SCHOOL:
SHAPING  OUR  FUTURE  SCIENCE,  TECH-
NOLOGY,  ENGINEERING  AND  MATH  LEAD-
ERS  OF  TOMORROW  BY  INSPIRING  OUR
CHILDREN  TODAY

MONDAY,  MAY  12,  2008

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES,

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY,

Washington, DC.

The Committee met, pursuant to call, at 1:17 p.m. At the Martha
and  Josh  Morriss  Mathematics  and  Engineering  Elementary
School,  Texarkana,  Texas,  Hon.  Bart  Gordon  [Chairman  of  the
Committee] presiding.

(1)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

2

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

3

FIELD HEARING CHARTER

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY

U.S. HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

STEM Education Before High School:

Shaping Our Future Science, Technology,

Engineering and Math Leaders of

Tomorrow By Inspiring

Our Children Today

MONDAY, MAY 12, 2008

1:00 P.M.–3:00 P.M.

MARTHA AND JOSH MORRISS MATHEMATICS AND

ENGINEERING ELEMENTARY SCHOOL

TEXARKANA, TEXAS

1. Purpose

On  Monday,  May  12,  2008,  the  Science  and  Technology  Committee  will  hold  a
field hearing in Texarkana, Texas, to receive testimony on efforts to engage students
in  math  and  science  at  an  early  age,  to  keep  them  interested  throughout  middle
school  and  high  school,  and  to  translate  that  interest  into  rewarding  careers  that
will  be  of  benefit  to  the  entire  Nation  from  a  federal,  school  district,  university,  in-
dustry and teacher perspective. Further, we will examine the efforts behind and rea-
sons  for  the  establishment  of  a  STEM-based  public  elementary  school  and  the
progress  that  it  is  making  with  its  students,  which  could  serve  as  a  model  for  the
Nation.

2. Witnesses
• Dr.  Cora  Marrett,  Assistant  Director  for  the  Education  and  Human  Resources

Directorate, National Science Foundation (NSF), Washington, DC

• Dr.  Rosanne  Stripling,  Provost  and  Vice  President  for  Academic  Affairs,  Texas

A&M University-Texarkana, Texarkana, TX

• Mr. James Henry Russell, Superintendent, Texarkana Independent School Dis-

• Mr.  David  Smedley,  Science  Teacher,  North  Heights  Junior  High  School,  Tex-

trict, Texarkana, TX

arkana, AR

• Mr. Mike Leherr, Plant Manager, Alcoa-Texarkana, Texarkana, TX

3. Brief Overview

• A consensus exists that improving science, technology, engineering, and math-
ematics  (STEM)  education  throughout  the  Nation  is  a  necessary,  if  not  suffi-
cient,  condition  for  preserving  our  capacity  for  innovation  and  discovery  and
for ensuring U.S. economic strength and competitiveness in the international
marketplace  of  the  21st  century.  Many  reports,  including  those  from  the
Council on Competitiveness, Business Roundtable, and the National Academy
of  Sciences’  Rising  above  the  Gathering  Storm,1 placed  a  major  emphasis  on
strengthening  STEM  education  in  the  United  States  to  ensure  that  the  Na-
tion’s workforce can compete globally in high-tech, high-value industries, such
as  information  technology,  biotechnology,  semiconductor  manufacturing,  and
nanotechnology.  The  President  addressed  these  needs  in  his  American  Com-
petitiveness  Initiative  and  Congress,  likewise,  in  the  America  COMPETES
Act, which is now law (Public Law 110–69).

1 Rising  Above  the  Gathering  Storm:  Energizing  and  Employing  America  for  a  Brighter  Eco-

nomic Future, National Academies Press, Washington, D.C. (2006).

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

4

• Historically,  NSF’s  mission  has  included  supporting  and  strengthening
science and math education programs at all levels. In the area of K–12, NSF
carries out its mission by funding a variety of science and math education ac-
tivities,  including  teacher  training  (both  in-service  and  pre-service),  cur-
riculum  development,  education  research,  and  informal  education  at  muse-
ums and science centers.
• Critical transitions occur as students move from elementary schools to middle
schools,  from  middle  schools  to  high  schools,  and  from  high  schools  to  post-
secondary  education.  International  data  show  corresponding  shifts  in  stu-
dents’  achievement  rankings  internationally,  where  performance  of  U.S.  stu-
dents  relative  to  that  of  students  around  the  world  generally  drops  from
fourth grade to eighth grade, and then drops further in high school. And, the
curriculum in mathematics and science may reflect significant jumps in com-
plexity  and  demand  as  these  critical  transitions  occur.  For  example,  elemen-
tary  school  students  who  have  been  studying  concepts  and  procedures  in  the
area of numbers increasingly must meet the challenge of studying algebra in
the middle grades. A related consideration that comes with the critical transi-
tions  is  that  students’  interest  in  the  STEM  fields,  and  their  enthusiasm  for
mathematics  and  science,  also  may  decrease  as  they  move  from  the  elemen-
tary  grades,  to  the  middle  grades,  and  beyond.  Teachers  have  enormous  re-
sponsibility  to  support  students’  growth  and  competency,  stimulate  their  in-
terest  and  enthusiasm,  and  ensure  that  they  are  prepared  for  assessments
and higher level work in subsequent grades.
• The  Martha  and  Josh  Morriss  Mathematics  and  Engineering  Elementary
School  in  Texarkana,  Texas,  is  part  of  a  vertical  aligned  K–16  engineering
education  collaborative  between  Texas  A&M  University-Texarkana  and  Tex-
arkana  Independent  School  District.  It  provides  mathematics  and  pre-engi-
neering  integrated  curriculum  and  pre-engineering  electives  for  students  in
kindergarten  through  fifth  grade.  Students  graduating  from  the  elementary
school  will  be  able  move  into  an  advanced  Math  and  Science  program  at
Texas Middle School. This school serves as a national model for K–16 collabo-
ration in how young children can become engaged in and educated for careers
in mathematics and engineering.

4. Background
K–12 Science and Math Education at the National Science Foundation

Science  and  math  education  is  a  cornerstone  of  the  historic  mission  of  the  Na-
tional  Science  Foundation.  The  National  Science  Foundation  Act  of  1950,  which  es-
tablished NSF, directed NSF to support and strengthen science and math education
programs  at  all  levels.  NSF  carries  out  its  K–12  mission  by  supporting  a  variety
of  science  and  math  education  activities,  including  teacher  training  (both  in-service
and  pre-service),  curriculum  development,  education  research,  and  informal  edu-
cation at museums and science centers.

Examples  of  NSF  programs  designed  to  improve  teacher  performance,  enhance
understanding of student retention of scientific content, and develop and assess cur-
ricula  include  the  Centers  for  Learning  and  Teaching,  which  provide  professional
development  opportunities  for  K–12  teachers;  the  Advanced  Learning  Technologies
program,  which  supports  cognitive  science  research  on  the  use  of  technology  to  en-
hance learning and teaching; and the Instructional Materials Development program,
which supports the development of curriculum as well as research into the most ef-
fective means of teaching math and science material.

In addition to these programs, other NSF education programs focused on improv-
ing  K–12  education  include  the  Math  and  Science  Partnership  (MSP)  Program  and
the  Robert  Noyce  Scholarship  (Noyce)  Program,  both  reauthorized  as  part  of  the
America  COMPETES  Act.  The  MSP  Program  funds  partnerships  between  univer-
sities  and  local  school  districts  to  strengthen  the  science  and  math  content  knowl-
edge  of  K–12  schoolteachers.  The  grants  are  awarded  to  support  the  creation  of  in-
novative  reform  programs  that  could  be  expanded  to  the  State  level  if  successful.
The  Robert  Noyce  Scholarship  Program  is  designed  to  help  recruit  highly-qualified
science and math teachers through grants to college and universities to give scholar-
ships  to  science  and  math  majors  in  return  for  their  commitment  to  teach  at  the
elementary  or  secondary  school  level.  America  COMPETES  strengthened  and  ex-
panded  the  Robert  Noyce  Teacher  Scholarship  Program  to  provide  scholarships  to
students  majoring  in  science,  math  or  engineering  who  commit  to  teaching  two
years  in  return  for  each  year  of  aid.  The  program  provides  money  to  colleges  and
universities both to award and administer the scholarships and to provide programs

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

5

to help prepare the students for teaching. The expansion of this program was mod-
eled on the UTEACH program at the University of Texas.

Texas  A&M  University–Texarkana  and  Texarkana  Independent  School  District  Pre-

K–16 Collabortive2

Texas A&M University-Texarkana and Texarkana Independent School District es-
tablished  a  vertically  aligned  kindergarten–16  engineering  education  collaborative
that will be executed in four stages: (1) a K–5 public elementary school (Martha and
Josh Morriss Mathematics & Engineering Elementary School) that provides a math-
ematics  and  pre-engineering  integrated  curriculum,  ‘‘Engineering  Encounters’’  (cul-
minating projects), and pre-engineering electives (i.e., circuitry, forces and gears) at
each grade level (opened fall 2007); (2) a pre-engineering ‘‘school-within-a-school’’ at
Texas  Middle  school  (planned  for  fall  2008);  (3)  selected  mathematics  and  science
courses  with  pre-engineering  content  enrichment  and  dual  credit  engineering
courses  at  Texas  High  School  (fall  2006);  and  (4)  a  choice  of  three  engineering  re-
lated  programs  of  study  at  A&M–Texarkana:  BS  in  Computer  and  Information
Sciences (fall 2005), BS in Electrical Engineering (planned for fall 2008), and BS in
Mechanical Engineering (planned for fall 2010).

The  overarching  goal  of  the  engineering  collaborative  is  to  increase  the  quantity
and quality of United States grown and educated engineers. The goal will be accom-
plished  by  exposing  young  children  to  exciting  mathematics  and  engineering  con-
cepts  and  providing  a  rigorous  and  seamless  pre-engineering  and  engineering  edu-
cation curriculum through the completion of a baccalaureate degree. A growing gap
between  the  supply  and  demand  for  professionals  in  engineering  and  mathematics
careers has alerted stakeholders across the Nation. The regional need for more engi-
neers  was  documented  in  the  late  1990s  when  Texarkana  area  businesses  (e.g.,
International Paper, Domtar Paper Mill, and Alcoa) identified the need for an engi-
neering  program  at  A&M–Texarkana  as  the  number  one  community  priority.  Their
expressed  need  has  been  manifested  in  contributions  of  almost  $7  million  to  date
for an engineering degree program at the university.

Although the effectiveness of a K–16 engineering collaborative as a means of ame-
liorating  the  supply  and  demand  gap  of  engineers  is  a  very  logical,  research-based
approach,  a  comprehensive  search  has  not  identified  another  partnership  of  this
kind across the United States. The Texas A&M University–Texarkana ISD K–16 en-
gineering  collaborative  is  a  unique,  sustainable,  and  replicable  model  that  sets  a
gold standard for how public schools and universities can maximize the investment
return  on  human  and  financial  resources  to  attain  an  important  and  shared  goal—
to  ‘‘close  the  gap’’  between  participation  and  success  in  secondary  and  higher  edu-
cation in a manner that effectively addresses a growing professional and career de-
mand if the United States is to continue its position as a global power—engineering
and mathematics.

The Martha and Josh Morriss Mathematics and Engineering Elementary School3

The  Martha  and  Josh  Morriss  Mathematics  and  Engineering  Elementary  School,
serving children in grades K–5, is the eighth elementary school in Texarkana Inde-
pendent  School  District  opened  in  the  fall  of  2007.  The  school  does  not  have  an  at-
tendance zone, and any elementary-aged student living in the State of Texas is eligi-
ble to apply for enrollment on a first-come basis without charge. Once a student has
been accepted for enrollment, certain academic and behavior standards are required
for  continued  attendance.  The  school  is  designed  for  approximately  396  students
(three sections each in grades K–5). As of September 30, 2006—eleven months prior
to  the  opening  of  the  new  school—100  percent  of  the  available  positions  at  grades
K–4  and  89  percent  at  grade  5  were  committed,  with  49  percent  of  the  student  en-
rollment  to  date  being  female.  A  waiting  list  has  been  established  for  most  of  the
primary grades, and over 80 kindergarten applications for the 2008–2009 and 2009–
2010 academic years have been submitted.

The  floor  plan  and  architectural  design  of  the  new  school  facilitates  the  delivery
of an inquiry-based mathematics and engineering integrated curriculum for all sub-
jects  in  grades  K–5,  including  fine  arts,  foreign  language,  health  and  physical  edu-
cation as well as the four core subject areas. The mathematics and engineering em-
bedded  Texas  Essential  Knowledge  and  Skills  (TEKS)  curriculum  is  enhanced  by
‘‘engineering  encounters’’—cross-grade  level,  theme-based  authentic  assessment

2 TIDS–TAMU–T  K–16  COLLABORATIVE  MORRISS  ELEMENTARY  SCHOOL  (http://

www.tea.state.tx.us/p16/council¥mtg¥attach/presentations/feb08/
feb08¥regionalp16¥texarkana.pdf)

3 Ibid.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

6

projects  completed  and  presented  by  students  to  the  public  each  six-weeks  (see  Ex-
amples).  The  K–6  grade  mathematics  and  science  TEKS  is  accelerated  into  grades
K–5 (and grades 7 and 8 content into the 6th grade at middle school), allowing stu-
dents  to  take  Algebra  I  and  advanced  science  in  grade  7  to  provide  opportunities
for advanced mathematics, science, and engineering courses in high school. Further,
engineering electives (content beyond the TEKS) will be taught at each grade level.
Extended  school-year  enrichment  activities  such  as  a  two-week  summer  Circuitry
Camp provide a ‘‘value added’’ element to students’ learning.

Texas A&M University–Texarkana Arts and Sciences and Education faculty assist
the  Texarkana  ISD  curriculum  personnel  and  teachers  to  design  the  mathematics
and engineering integrated curriculum and electives. University faculty develop con-
tent  and  pedagogy  courses  to  train  the  elementary  teachers  to  deliver  the  cur-
riculum  using  effective  teaching  strategies  that  promote  mastery  of  the  curriculum
by  all  students.  All  of  the  Morriss  Elementary  teachers  are  required  to  obtain  a
Masters  Degree  and  either  the  Texas  Master  Mathematics  Teacher  Certification  or
Texas  Master  Technology  Teacher  Certification  through  preparation  programs  of-
fered at A&M–Texarkana.

The  Martha  and  Josh  Morriss  Mathematics  and  Engineering  Elementary  School
has  become  a  national  model  for  K–16  collaboration  in  how  young  children  can  be-
come engaged in and educated for careers in mathematics and engineering.

5. Questions for the Witnesses
Dr. Cora Marrett

• What evidence is available from NSF-funded projects to help us better under-
stand how students develop interests in STEM fields in the pre-K through 12
years,  and  how  can  those  interests  be  sustained  across  the  high  school  to
post-secondary education transition? Are there model programs or approaches
to curriculum and instruction that have demonstrated how to engage students
successfully  in  STEM  areas  and  that  lead  to  choice  of  STEM  careers?  What
is  the  role  of  out-of-school  learning  in  encouraging  STEM  career  participa-
tion?  What  factors  affect  students’  choice  of  STEM  majors  or  programs  and
their retention at the post-secondary level?
• How do NSF programs support the improvement of the teaching and learning
of  the  STEM  disciplines  in  the  pre-K  through  12  years?  What  programs  are
available  to  improve  teachers’  knowledge  and  abilities,  and  what  does  re-
search  tell  us  about  the  best  ways  to  enable  teachers’  effectiveness  in  pro-
moting learning? What types of programs and models for STEM teacher prep-
aration,  induction,  and  professional  development  show  the  most  promise  for
supporting STEM teachers’ learning, and what can be learned from the imple-
mentation of such programs and models?
• What instructional tools, resources, materials, and technologies has NSF sup-
ported  to  enable  STEM  learning?  Under  what  conditions,  and  for  whom,  are
such resources for learning most effective? Does research provide insight into
what kinds of instructional materials and tools are most useful in supporting
learning at various levels, and for various groups of learners?

Dr. Rosanne Stripling

• How  was  Texas  A&M–Texarkana  involved  with  the  creation  of  the  Martha
and  Josh  Morriss  Mathematics  and  Engineering  Elementary  School?  What
other  pre-K  through  12  schools  does  Texas  A&M–Texarkana  support  and
how?  Please  describe  any  other  work  or  partnerships  that  Texas  A&M–Tex-
arkana  is  doing  with  regards  to  STEM  education  for  pre-K  through  12
schools.
• What  are  the  major  problems  that  limit  the  performance  of  students  and
teachers,  and  what  do  you  feel  is  the  single,  most  important  step  that  the
Federal  Government  should  take  to  improve  pre-K  through  12  grade  math
and  science  education?  What  involvement  have  you  had  with  math  and
science  education  programs  at  the  National  Science  Foundation  or  other  fed-
eral  agencies  as  well  as  those  in  the  State  of  Texas?  What  are  the  most  im-
portant and effective components of these programs?
• How  can  we  attract,  educate  and  retain  the  critical  mass  of  talent  necessary
to  keep  the  State  of  Texas—and  the  country  as  a  whole—at  the  forefront  of
research,  development  and  ground-breaking  advances  in  science  and  tech-
nology? In addition to providing a technically literate workforce, why is it im-
portant to improve public support and understanding of math and science?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

7

• How can we ensure that we provide sufficient opportunities to allow students
and researchers, educators and employees to become and then remain current
and competitive in our rapidly evolving world?

Mr. James Henry Russell

• What is the overall state of STEM education in Texarkana? Why is it impor-
tant  for  all  students  to  achieve  proficiency  in  these  subjects?  What  was  the
motivation  behind  establishing  the  Martha  and  Josh  Morriss  Mathematics
and  Engineering  Elementary  School?  What  role  did  parents,  the  community
and local businesses play in the establishment of this school? Is there a plan
in place to keep these students motivated in STEM subjects as they make the
transition to middle school and on to high school?
• What  are  the  major  problems  that  limit  the  performance  of  students  and
teachers,  and  what  do  you  feel  is  the  single,  most  important  step  that  the
Federal  Government  should  take  to  improve  K–12th  grade  math  and  science
education? What involvement have you had with math and science education
programs  at  the  National  Science  Foundation  or  other  federal  agencies  as
well  as  those  in  the  State  of  Texas?  What  are  the  most  important  and  effec-
tive components of these programs?
• How  can  we  grow  and  educate,  attract  and  retain  the  best  and  brightest  sci-
entists and engineering students? What do you feel is the single, most impor-
tant step that the Federal Government should take to improve pre-K through
12 STEM education?

Mr. David Smedley

• What  are  the  major  problems  that  limit  the  performance  of  students  and
teachers,  and  what  do  you  feel  is  the  single,  most  important  step  that  the
Federal  Government  should  take  to  improve  K–12th  grade  math  and  science
education? What involvement have you had with math and science education
programs  at  the  National  Science  Foundation  or  other  federal  agencies  as
well as those in the State of Arkansas? What are the most important and ef-
fective components of these programs?
• How can we spark a greater student interest in math and science education?
What can we do to ensure that student interest in math and science does not
wane  as  they  progress  through  our  formal  system  of  education?  Specifically,
how  do  you  keep  your  junior  high  students  motivated  and  excited  about
STEM?
• What  challenges  do  you  face  in  improving  student  achievement  in  math  and
science education? How can parents, businesses, the community, and the gov-
ernment  better  support  you  in  your  efforts  to  raise  student  proficiency  in
STEM?
• What elements of your pre-service or in-service training have been most help-
ful  in  meeting  the  daily  demands  of  working  with  students,  developing  inno-
vative  classroom  strategies,  and  delivering  content-rich  instruction  to  stu-
dents of all levels and abilities? As a professional teacher, what partnerships
or collaborations with local colleges or universities have been most helpful to
you in terms of access to materials or professional development?

Mr. Michael Leherr

• Why did Alcoa choose to become involved with the creation of the Martha and
Josh  Morriss  Mathematics  and  Engineering  Elementary  School?  What  other
schools does Alcoa support and how? Why is it important for Alcoa to be inter-
ested in pre-K through 12 education?
• How  do  we  avoid  a  disconnect  between  the  jobs  we  want  to  keep  in  the  U.S.
and our workforce’s ability to perform those jobs? How is Alcoa working with
pre-K  through  12  schools  as  well  as  colleges,  universities  and  training  pro-
grams to avoid that disconnect?
• Please  describe  what  Alcoa  Texarkana  does?  What  percentage  of  your  work-
force  has  a  STEM  background?  Are  you  able  to  recruit  locally  for  these  posi-
tions  and  if  not,  why  not?  How  do  you  work  with  the  local  colleges  and  uni-
versities to support your workforce? If you have mentoring programs in place
to encourage your engineers to help out in STEM classes at the pre-K through
12  levels  or  even  in  college  courses,  please  provide  information  on  these  pro-
grams or similar activities Alcoa supports.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

8

Chairman GORDON. Good afternoon. I’m pleased to be here in the

district for this field hearing.

I  have  told  Congressman  Hall  this  before,  but  my  grandfather
used  to  tell  me—I’m  from  Tennessee.  My  grandfather  used  to  tell
me  every  time  we  met  the  population  increased,  so  I’m  happy  to
have some of my relatives from Texas here today. I’m very pleased
to  be  here,  folks,  with  Ralph  Hall  and  Mike  Ross.  I  think  Tex-
arkana is well served by having a Democrat, a Republican, a Texan
and  a  young  fellow  from  Arkansas  work  together.  That’s  how  you
get things done. We try and do the same thing on the Science and
Technology  Committee  in  Washington.  We  are  something  of  an
anomaly.  I  am  very  fortunate  to  have  Ralph  Hall  as  a  Ranking
Member.

Over  the  last  year  and  a  half  we’ve  passed  out  over  30  bills,  all
of  which  have  been  bipartisan,  all  but  one  unanimous,  including
the  Pete’s  bill  that  I  think  is  a  type  of  role  model  that  I  hope  we
can show the rest of Congress. We’ll all be better off to do that.

Sitting next to Ralph, he’s been telling me for the last year about
this school and this district. We’re all proud of our own district, but
he keeps saying there really is something special about the Morriss
Elementary  School  and  wanted  me  to  come  down  and  see  it.  It’s
been a delight to be here. Certainly, you have a wonderful facility,
but  really  it’s  more  than  just  the  building.  It’s  the  attitude  of  the
children.  I  hope  the  model  that  you  have  established  here  can  be
an  incubator  that  we  can  roll  out  to  other  and  scale  out  all  across
the country.

I’m looking forward to going over some time to Mike’s to the Ar-
kansas  school  for  math  and  science  and  arts.  I’ve  heard  Mike  tell
this  a  couple  of  times,  but  he  was  in  the  State  Senate  when  this
school  was  created.  He  had  the  legislation.  He  thought  it  was  a
pretty good idea until his daughter was accepted and moved away.
He  didn’t  think  it  was  quite  as  good,  but  I  think  he’s  acclimated
himself,  and  his  son  will  go  there  soon.  So,  that’s  another  good
model that we want to look for.

So,  I  can  say  without  qualms  that  I  would  not  be  Chairman  of
this committee if it wasn’t for Ralph Hall. So, at this time I would
like  to  pass  the  gavel  to  my  friend  Congressman  Hall  for  the  re-
mainder of this hearing.

Mr.  HALL.  [presiding.]  I  thank  you,  and  how  long  are  you  going
to allow me to keep this gavel? I’ll be back in Washington with you
Tuesday morning, I’ll give it back to you.

Of  course  I’m  honored  to  be  here  and  to  have  so  many  here  for
such  a  worthy  cause  and  for  something  that  we’re  all  so  proud  of,
to attract these men and women of industry throughout the United
States and to have them here. And one in particular that’s with us
is, he just spoke to a very fine group, Mr. Tom Pickens. I ask that
he  be  granted  the  right  to  be  at  the  table  and  to  give  an  opening
five-minute  speech  as  others  do  and  to  give  answers  to  questions.
Any objection? The Chair hears none.

As you all do up there in Washington, I now recognize myself for
five minutes for an opening statement. I wanted to first thank our
astronaut  who  has  been  wonderful  with  visiting  with  the  young-
sters  today.  Lee  Archambault  has  been  to  space.  He  flew,  I  think,
for 5.8 million miles in a 14-day period as the pilot of the Atlantis

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

9

Shuttle  mission.  He’s  going  back.  He  has  flown  I  think  over  4,000
flight hours on more than 30 different aircrafts. He has been great
with  the  youngsters  today  with  three  different  groups  of  classes.
He’s  answered  questions.  He  brought  them  up  to  date  on  robotics.
As  they  have  been  working  on  them  in  the  classroom  here,  he
showed how they used the work that they’ve been doing, that they
were  being  taught  at  that  time  in  space  because  he  was  a  part  of
the  crew  that  went  up  to  repair  a  space  station,  and  they  used  a
robot  to  take  a  piece  of  the  station  over  and  put  it  way  out  to  the
end of the station in space there. These youngsters saw their work
in action there, and I think that was great for them.

So,  I  want  to  officially  welcome  you,  Chairman  Gordon,  to  the
Fourth  District  of  Texas  and  thank  you  for  making  the  journey.  I
think we can both agree that what we’ve experienced this morning
was pretty impressive.

Mr.  Ross,  I’m  going  to  have  more  to  say  about  you  in  just  a
minute,  but  I’m  very  glad  that  you  joined  us.  I  can’t  be  granted
enough  time  to  say  good  things  about  you,  and  I  have  to  because
he  chairs  about  half  of  the  sessions  in  Congress  now.  I  have  to
stand up, and he says ‘‘What purpose is the gentleman from Texas
standing?’’  I  have  to  tell  him  and  beg  him  to  let  me  speak  for  five
minutes.  If  I’m  real  nice  to  him  in  front  of  his  own  folks  he  ought
to give me ten minutes, don’t you think?

Seems  like  it  was  only  yesterday  that  I  was  here  in  the  dedica-
tion  celebration  of  the  Martha  and  Josh  Morriss  Mathematics  and
Engineering Elementary School. We’ve had them this morning. We
are so proud of them. They are a giving family, a successful family,
a caring family, and we’re benefiting from their generosity. I know
they are proud of what they have established here. It’s good to see
so many of my Texarkana County friends in the audience including
both  Martha  and  Josh  who  donated  the  land  for  the  school  and
Scott  Bruner,  President  of  the  Texarkana  Independent  School  Dis-
trict Board of Trustees. Thank you.

The collaboration between Texas Independent School District and
Texas A&M University Texarkana to make the Morriss School a re-
ality is one that can and should be replicated. The concept of start-
ing  a  STEM  program  that  a  student  can  follow  from  kindergarten
all  the  way  through  a  baccalaureate  degree  and  all  in  their  own
hometown is very positive. It’s good to see that local businesses like
Alcoa  and  others  recognize  the  value  in  supporting  such  an  effort.
The Texarkana collaboration is a slightly different approach than
what  we  created  in  America  COMPETES,  but  we  never  intended
for that to be the only solution. This nation’s full of good visionary
ideas,  and  the  area  of  STEM  education  is  no  exception.  I  look  for-
ward  to  hearing  from  Dr.  Marrett  about  some  of  the  other  ideas
NSF  is  funding  on  the  federal  level  as  well  as  how  Mr.  Smedley
is  motivating  some  of  his  own  students  in  Arkansas.  Inspiring  our
children  about  math  and  science  at  an  early  age  is  important.
Keeping  them  enthusiastic  as  they  progress  through  middle  school
and high school and into college is critical.

As  I  said  at  the  school  dedication  last  September,  advancing
STEM  education  must  be  a  national  priority  if  we  are  to  prepare
our  students  for  21st  century  jobs  and  keep  pace  with  countries
like  China  and  India  who  are  graduating  larger  number  of  STEM

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

10

students. They may be graduating more, but the quality of ours re-
mains  unsurpassed  in  this  world.  America  has  always  been  the
leader  in  cutting-edge  technology  and  innovation,  and  we  have  to
do  all  we  can  do  to  insure  a  strong  footing  as  a  global  economic
leader.  I  appreciate  all  of  you  witnesses  being  here  today.  I  know
it took you time to get here and took you time to prepare for being
here.  Thank  you  for  giving  us  the  time  that  you’re  giving.  I  look
forward to your testimony.

At this time I turn to my colleague Mr. Gordon, the distinguished
Chairman of the Committee, and recognize him for any other open-
ing remarks he might want to make.

Chairman GORDON. Thank you, Mr. Hall.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Hall follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE RALPH M. HALL

First,  I  want  to  officially  welcome  you,  Chairman  Gordon,  to  the  fourth  district
of Texas and to thank you for making the journey and spending the entire day with
us.  I  believe  we  can  both  agree  that  what  we  experienced  this  morning  was  pretty
impressive.

It seems like it was only yesterday that I was here for the dedication celebration
for the Martha and Josh Morriss Mathematics and Engineering Elementary School.
I  know  these  folks  are  proud  of  what  they  have  established  here,  and  it’s  good  to
see  so  many  of  my  Texarkana  friends  in  the  audience,  including  Martha  and  Josh
Morris, who donated the land for the school, and Scott Bruner, President of the Tex-
arkana Independent School District (TISD) Board of Trustees.

The  collaboration  between  TISD  and  Texas  A&M  University–Texarkana  to  make
the  Morriss  School  a  reality  is  one  that  can  and  should  be  replicated.  The  concept
of  starting  a  STEM  program  that  a  student  can  follow  from  kindergarten  all  the
way  through  a  baccalaureate  degree,  and  all  in  their  home  town,  is  very  positive.
It is good to see that local businesses, like Alcoa, recognize the value in supporting
such an effort.

The Texarkana collaboration is a slightly different approach than what we created
in America COMPETES, but we never intended for that to be the only solution. This
nation  is  full  of  good  visionary  ideas,  and  the  area  of  STEM  education  is  no  excep-
tion. I look forward to hearing from Dr. Marrett about some of the other ideas NSF
is  funding  on  the  federal  level,  as  well  as  how  Mr.  Smedley  is  motivating  his  own
students in Arkansas. Inspiring our children about math and science at an early age
is important. Keeping them enthusiastic as they progress through middle school and
high school and into college is critical.

As  I  said  at  the  school  dedication  last  September,  advancing  STEM  education
must  be  a  national  priority  if  we  are  to  prepare  our  students  for  21st  century  jobs
and keep pace with countries like China and India who are graduating larger num-
bers  of  STEM  students.  They  may  be  graduating  more,  but  the  quality  of  ours  re-
mains  unsurpassed  in  the  world.  America  has  always  been  the  leader  in  cutting
edge  technology  and  innovation—and  we  must  do  all  we  can  to  ensure  our  strong
footing as a global economic leader.

I  appreciate  all  of  our  witnesses  being  here  today  and  look  forward  to  your  testi-

mony.

Chairman  GORDON.  Let  me  concur  with  your  remarks.  Also,  I
thank  the  witnesses  here.  Colonel  Armstrong,  you  might  be  in  a
situation some time in the future, some of you probably know that
Congressman  Hall  was  a  fighter  pilot  during  World  War  II,  and
they had a reunion in Washington with some of the other folks that
he flew with at that time. They were talking there and I overheard
them,  and  one  of  them  said  it  sure  was  windy,  and  the  next  one
says, no, it’s Thursday. And Ralph said I’m thirsty too. Let’s go out
and get a beer.

In  all  seriousness,  this  is  a  very  important  program  for  us  to
learn from. There is six and a half billion people in the world, half
of which make less than two dollars a day. We do not want to com-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

11

pete  in  that  regard.  If  we  do,  my  seven-year-old  daughter  could  be
the  first  generation  of  Americans  to  inherit  a  national  standard  of
living  less  than  their  parents.  So,  what  we’ve  got  to  be  able  to  do
is  we’ve  got  to  make  20  or  30  or  50  widgets  for  every  one  they’re
making  in  China  and  India  and  elsewhere.  To  do  that,  we  have  to
work at a higher skill level, whether you’re a high school graduate
or  junior  college  or  a  college  graduate.  And  that  means  you  have
to  have  a  background  in  STEM,  and  we’re  not  doing  well  in  that.
Here in the United States among the OECD city countries, those
of  industrialized  countries  in  recent  scores  we  were  21st  out  of  30
in  science  and  25th  out  of  30  in  math.  That’s  not  what  we’re  used
to  in  this  country,  and  we  have  to  do  better,  which  means  we’ve
got to look at the type of programs here at the Morriss Elementary
and  scale  that  out.  I’m  anxious  to  learn  more  about  how  you  got
the  vision,  how  you  enacted  it,  and  how  we  can  take  that  to  other
places. So, thank you, Mr. Hall.

Mr. HALL. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
[The prepared statement of Chairman Gordon follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHAIRMAN BART GORDON

Good  afternoon.  It  is  with  great  pleasure  that  I  welcome  my  fellow  Committee
Members  and  our  distinguished  panel  of  experts  to  the  Martha  and  Josh  Morriss
Mathematics and Engineering Elementary School, here in Texarkana, for what will
undoubtedly be a valuable discussion on STEM education before high school.

Last  August,  Congress  passed  and  the  President  signed  into  law  the  America
COMPETES  Act.  A  response  to  the  2005  National  Academies’  report  Rising  Above
the Gathering Storm, and supported by a wide range of U.S. industries, universities,
and  science  organizations,  COMPETES  seeks  to  ensure  U.S.  students,  teachers,
businesses,  and  workers  will  continue  leading  the  world  in  science,  innovation,  re-
search, and technology.

As  we  all  know,  the  global  marketplace  continues  to  become  more  competitive.
The  fact  of  the  matter  is,  our  country  cannot  and  should  not  compete  with  the  rest
of  the  world  on  wages  when  half  of  the  world’s  workers  earn  less  than  two  dollars
a day. Our country needs to compete at a higher level—with better skills and higher
productivity.

But  today,  America  is  falling  behind  other  countries  in  educating  our  kids  in
STEM  fields,  and  American  students  continue  to  score  below  average  on  math  and
science tests. According to the latest OECD Program for International Students As-
sessment,  or  PISA,  students  in  the  U.S.  ranked  25th  out  of  30  developed  countries
in math and 21st out of 30 developed countries in science.

The America COMPETES Act seeks to reverse this trend and ensure not only that
our  nation  will  produce  the  world’s  leading  scientists  and  engineers  but  also  that
all students will have a strong grounding in math and science and are prepared for
technical jobs in every sector of the economy.

I look forward to hearing testimony today from our witnesses on this subject. Hav-
ing  had  the  opportunity  today  to  tour  the  Martha  and  Josh  Morriss  Mathematics
and Engineering Elementary school I look forward to learning more about its estab-
lishment  as  a  STEM-based  public  elementary  school,  and  the  progress  it  is  making
with its Pre-K through 12th grade students here in Texarkana.

Mr.  HALL.  At  this  time,  I  recognize  Mr.  Ross  who  shares  Tex-
arkana  with  me;  we  work  well  together.  He’s  a  Democrat,  and  I’m
a Republican, but we put aside all those things when something for
the good of this city or good of Bowie County or for the good of any
part of Arkansas. My mother is from Cave City, Arkansas. My Ad-
ministrative  Assistant  Janet  Poppleton.  Where  are  you,  Janet?
Stand  up.  She’s  the  head  of  the  Fourth  Congressional  District  in
my  office  in  Washington  and  the  offices  here  in  Texas.  I’m  very
proud  to  have  her  and  very  proud  to  have  Marjorie  and  Eric.
Thank you for what you do here for me in Texarkana.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

12

Mr. Ross is the Congressman of District 4 over in Arkansas. Let
me  tell  you  a  little  about  him.  He  presides  more  often  probably
than anyone else up there other than the Speaker herself. It seems
that  any  time  there  is  really  a  tough  situation  or  anything  that’s
agonizing,  I  look  up  there  and  she  has  Mike  in  that  chair,  and
there’s  some  reason  for  it.  It’s  because  he’s  very  good  at  it.  He’s
very fair, and he makes things happen.

So, Mike, here in the presence of your people, you grew up here,
you went to school here, highly recognized, highly appreciated here,
and  I  say  to  you  personally  I’m  honored  to  get  to  work  with  you,
and  I’m  always  proud  when  I  see  you  in  the  chair.  Of  course,  I’ll
be more proud when the situation changes up there and maybe I’m
the  Chairman  and  Bart’s  the  Ranking  Member,  but,  you  know  the
facts of life are that one of these days, the status we’re in, the situ-
ation we find ourselves, the attitude that other people of the world
have about the United States of America, some things are going to
have to change.

That  means  we’re  going  to  have  to  forget  we’re  Republicans  or
Democrats, liberals or conservatives, whatever we might be and re-
member  that  we’re  Americans,  and  put  those  youngsters  first  that
we  saw  this  morning,  that  our  astronaut  engaged  in  and  gave  his
time  to  this  morning.  If  he’s  still  here,  let  me  have  him  stand  up
again. Lee, please stand up here for us.

He  is  going  back  in  just  a  couple,  three  or  four  months,  and  I
believe every student he talked to today is going to follow him with
their interest and with their prayers. When you have to leave, Lee,
we  understand  you  have  a  flight  at  3:00,  and  we  know  when  you
get up and walk out it’s not because the Chairman here said some-
thing  you  didn’t  like.  It’s  because  you  have  to  catch  that  airplane.
We  honor  you  for  it.  You’ve  helped  us  more  than  you  know.  God
bless you and thank you.

I  just  practically  said  everything  that  Mike  Ross  wrote  out  for
me.  No,  it  was  from  my  heart,  and  I’m  honored  to  recognize  the
Congressman  for  as  long  as  you  want.  Normally,  we  ask  you  to
hold it down to five minutes.

Mr.  ROSS.  Normally  we’re  not  in  Texarkana,  right?  I’ll  be  brief.
Thank  you  Congressman  Hall  for  that  generous  introduction.  I’ve
got to tell you that Ralph and I have kind of a special relationship.
He  may  be  a  Republican  and  I  may  be  a  conservative  Democrat,
but  we  work  together.  Quite  frankly,  if  we  had  more  folks  doing
that in Washington, we’d be getting a lot more done for the Amer-
ican people.

Ralph  and  I  not  only  share  Texarkana  but  we’re  also  on  the
Science  Committee  together  as  well  as  the  Energy  and  Commerce
Committee  together.  In  fact,  Chairman  Gordon  is  also  on  the  En-
ergy  and  Commerce  Committee.  We  work  very  close  together  on  a
lot  of  issues,  and  I  want  to  thank  the  Chairman  for  making  the
trip,  the  gentleman  from  Tennessee  for  making  the  trip  and  being
here with us today in Texarkana.

I was explaining to Chairman Gordon a little bit about how Tex-
arkana operates. You know, you get on State Line Avenue and you
head south and everybody on the right hand side of the road votes
for  Ralph  and  buy  lottery  tickets,  and  everybody  on  the  left  hand
side  of  the  road  can  vote  for  me  and  buy  whiskey,  and  you  can’t

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

13

do either one on the other side of the road. That was the best way
I  knew  how  to  explain  the  twin  cities  that  we  have  here,  but  this
is a special place for me.

I  was  born  here.  I  met  my  wife  while  we  both  were  attending
Texarkana  Community  College.  She  is  from  here,  from  the  Texas
side. We were married here. While I represent 150 towns in nearly
half  the  state,  this  is  like  home.  We  live  just  up  the  road  in  Pres-
ton,  Arkansas.  Chairman  Gordon,  when  you  live  in  a  small  town
like  I  do,  you  come  to  Texarkana  to  either  have  a  baby  or  see  a
movie, and we’ve done both. We’ve done the latter more than we’ve
done  the  former.  My  son  Alex  was  born  here  May  14,  1992.  Y’all
can do the math on that and quickly figure out that this Thursday
is not a day I will be looking forward to; he will be 16.

Also,  I  have  a  close  tie  here  in  that  my  Chief  of  Staff  in  my
Washington  office  grew  up  here,  was  educated  here  in  the  Tex-
arkana/Arkansas  Public  School  system  and  is  a  Texarkana  native.
Chairman  Gordon  invited  me  to  be  part  of  an  official  delegation
back  in  January  to  travel  to  the  South  Pole,  a  place  that  only
35,000  people  have  ever  been.  After  I  completed  that  I  felt  like  an
astronaut, and Gabby Gifford who is a Member of Congress is actu-
ally married to an astronaut. I was sharing with her about my ex-
perience  and  how  it  took  60  hours  to  get  there.  You  literally  feel
like  you’re  on  another  planet.  She  went  home  and  discussed  that
with  her  astronaut  husband.  I  said  what  did  he  say.  She  said  to
tell you it doesn’t take 60 hours to get to the places that I go.

One  of  the  reasons  I  went  there  is  I  came  back  and  I  wrote  a
letter  to  every  science  teacher  in  my  district  giving  them  websites
and other information trying to encourage them to encourage their
young people to get involved in the maths and sciences. The reason
is quite simple. You know, when President Kennedy set out to put
a  man  on  the  Moon,  in  today’s  dollars  we  invested  90  billion.  We
did  a  lot  more  than  put  a  man  on  the  Moon.  We  grew  a  new  gen-
eration  of  innovators  in  this  country  that  have  gone  on  to  create
a  lot  of  technologies  that  we’re  now  beginning  to  take  for  granted.
I  believe  it  is  past  time  for  us  to  grow  a  new  generation  of
innovators  in  this  country  that  can  create  the  jobs  of  the  future
that  can  allow  us  to  reduce  our  dependence  on  foreign  oil  and  be-
come  more  energy  independent  on  home-grown  fuels.  I  believe  one
of  the  ways  to  do  that  is  to  focus  once  again  on  the  maths  and
sciences.  That’s  why  it  is  so  fitting  that  today  we  are  here  at  the
Martha  and  Josh  Morriss  Mathematics  and  Engineering  Elemen-
tary School.

I  see  some  folks  from  the  Morriss  family  here.  I  want  to  thank
y’all  for  your  commitment  to  the  maths,  sciences  and  engineering
and the great things that you are doing here. For the sake of—just
so  the  Chairman  can  get  an  idea,  it’s  probably  not  as  many  as  I’d
want, if you live on the Arkansas side, if you’ll stand up. We want
to recognize those who have made a trip to be a part of this today.
Chairman  GORDON.  Ask  if  they  bought  a  lottery  ticket  while

they’re here.

Mr. ROSS. Brittany Esterson is a former member of the Arkansas
Highway  Commission  and  a  dear  friend,  and  Steve  Harrelson.
Stand  up,  Steve.  Steve  is  a  State  Representative  for  the  Arkansas
side and the majority leader in the State House of Representatives

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

14

in  the  Arkansas.  We’re  delighted  to  have  him  with  us  today.  With
that,  Mr.  Chairman,  I’ll  submit  my  written  statement  for  the
record since I got a little carried away. In the sake of time I’ll sub-
mit my written statement for the record and give back the balance
of my time.

Mr.  HALL.  Thank  you.  They  will  be  of  record.  Without  objection

they will be put to the record.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Ross follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE MIKE ROSS

I would like to first thank Chairman Gordon and Ranking Member Hall for hold-
ing today’s hearing and all of the witnesses who have come today to discuss Science,
Technology,  Engineering,  and  Mathematics  education,  also  known  as  STEM  edu-
cation. I would also like to thank all of you for attending today and for your service
and  dedication  to  our  children’s  education.  It  is  an  honor  to  be  here  to  discuss  this
important  topic  and  I  am  hopeful  that  today’s  hearing  can  provide  a  forum  to  dis-
cuss ways that we can work together to encourage our youth to pursue these fields
of study.

As the son of two public school educators and the father of two children attending
public schools and universities, I have seen first hand how important our education
system is and I strongly believe that providing America’s children with a world class
public education is critical to our nation’s future. Decades ago when President Ken-
nedy  worked  to  put  a  man  on  the  Moon,  our  nation’s  investment  in  research,  tech-
nology, and education was unprecedented. This resulted in raising a new generation
of  innovators.  I  believe  that  we  can  do  that  again  by  supporting  and  encouraging
major  investments  in  STEM  education.  Today’s  students  will  be  tomorrow’s
innovators,  which  will  help  strengthen  our  economy,  create  new  jobs  here  at  home,
and help America compete in this new global economy.

STEM education is responsible for our nation’s technologically proficient workers,
as  well  as  our  scientists  and  engineers,  who  will  keep  our  nation  on  the  cutting
edge. As a member of the House Science and Technology Committee and the House
STEM  Education  Caucus,  I  am  personally  involved  with  these  issues  on  a  daily
basis. However, I am proud to help host this hearing today to foster more discussion
on the local level about STEM Education and the possibilities that it can bring.

As  many  of  you  know,  our  nation’s  future  competitiveness  in  the  global  economy
depends upon the ability of our schools to prepare students in mathematics and the
sciences and I am hopeful that today’s hearing can help us determine the best ways
to  shape  and  inspire  those  leaders  of  tomorrow.  Again,  thank  you  all  for  coming
today and for participating in this important discussion.

Mr.  HALL.  Mr.  Chairman,  and  also  Mike,  I  ask  unanimous  con-
sent  that  Tom  Pickens  be  added  to  the  group  who  will  give  testi-
mony. We will not ask him to give a five-minute opening statement
as  the  others  will  because  he  just  made  a  good  15-  or  20-minute
speech to a group at lunch. So we’ll waive that for you, Tom.

Introducing those of you who are going to give us testimony, I’ve
already  thanked  you  for  it.  Dr.  Cora  Marrett  is  Assistant  Director
for  the  Education  Human  Resources  Directorate  at  the  National
Science  Foundation.  To  have  someone  of  your  status  to  come  here
for  this  today,  Dr.  Marrett,  I  appreciate  you  making  the  trip  from
Washington.  Go  back  up  there  and  get  them  all  straightened  out.
We’re very honored to have you here. We look forward to your tes-
timony.

Dr.  Rosanne  Stripling  is  Provost  of  Texas  A&M  University  of
Texarkana.  She  and  her  husband,  Dr.  Larry  Sullivan,  who  is  the
former  Superintendent  and  now  City  Manager,  he  and  I  have  had
a  lot  of  talks  about  him  being  a  City  Manager.  I  described  to  him
what  a  city  manager  was,  how  they  were  like  a  B–17  rear  gunner
was  when  they  flew  over  Germany.  They  were  removed—the  gun-
nery was removed after every flight. I hope that this city manager

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

15

isn’t  like  a  lot  of  other  city  managers,  that  he  gets  moved  after
every thrust.

We  have  a  super  City  Manager.  He’s  doing  a  good  job.  The  city
ought  to  really  be  proud  of  him  and  thankful  to  him.  He  led  up  to
the  provisions  that  we  are  enjoying  here  today  and  the  youngsters
that are being educated.

I  thank  Dr.  Stripling  and  her  husband  Dr.  Larry  Sullivan  who
served again as City Manager, worked together to create the vision
for  K–12  STEM  education,  and  were  very  instrumental  in  helping
to  bring  all  this  to  fruition,  and  we  thank  you  and  look  forward  to
your testimony.

Mr.  James  Henry  Russell,  Superintendent  for  Texarkana  Inde-
pendent  School  District,  is  also  doing  a  tremendous  job.  We  look
forward to him giving us the same leadership that he took over. We
are honored to have you there.

Dr.  David  Smedley  is  a  science  teacher  at  North  Heights  Junior
High School on the other side of the state line. I understand North
Heights  is  a  NASA  Explorer  School  which  ties  in  nicely  with  our
visit this morning. We thank you and appreciate you.

Mr. Michael Leherr is the Plant Manager for Alcoa which I think
is the largest local employer in Texarkana; very generous with the
school  district  and  with  other  worthwhile  projects  in  this  area.
We’re thankful to have you as one of ours.

As  our  witnesses  know  and  have  been  told,  spoken  testimony  is
limited to five minutes each. We’re not going to get the hook at you
if you go five and a half minutes or fuss at you. We sure won’t fuss
if you only use three minutes. Each of the Committee Members will
have  five  minutes  each  to  ask  questions,  so  we’ll  start  with  Dr.
Marrett.
STATEMENT OF DR. CORA B. MARRETT, ASSISTANT DIRECTOR,
DIRECTORATE  FOR  EDUCATION  AND  HUMAN  RESOURCES,
NATIONAL SCIENCE FOUNDATION (NSF)
Dr.  MARRETT.  Thank  you  very  much.  Thank  you  Ranking  Mem-
ber  Hall,  Chairman  Gordon  and  Representative  Ross  for  holding
this hearing and inviting me to participate.

I  do  so  on  behalf  of  the  National  Science  Foundation.  As  you
know,  this  federal  agency,  NSF,  strives  to  promote  knowledge
about learning in science, technology, engineering and mathematics
or  STEM  and  strives  to  support  interventions  that  build  on  the
best of the knowledge.

Your legislative actions enrich the portfolio of NSF, as do the ac-
tivities  of  the  people  I  am  pleased  to  join  with  you  today  here  in
Texarkana.

The  emphasis  of  the  hearing  really  reflects  three  concerns:  stu-
dent  interest  in  science  technology,  engineering  and  mathematics
(STEM);  the  teaching  corps  for  STEM  education;  and  resources  for
that education. But, in fact, the three are interrelated. For student
interest  alone  does  not  shape  achievement  and  career  choices.  Ex-
periences  with  teachers  matter  significantly,  but  mere  entry  into
teaching cannot guarantee teaching excellence.

First  rate  professional  development  programs  are  essential,  but
professional  development  programs  in  the  absence  of  well-defined
and well designed tools and resources are insufficient.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

16

With  reference  to  the  three  themes,  the  three  concerns,  I  can
only introduce today some of the evidence that supports the conclu-
sions  I  just  described  about  student  interest,  professional  develop-
ment, and tools for learning. Let me note one bit of evidence, how-
ever,  that  comes  from  the  National  Longitudinal  Studies  of  Amer-
ican  Youth  or  LSAY.  This  is  a  project  that  NSF  first  supported  in
1989, and it sheds light on the issue of student interest.

There  is  a  slide  here  that  shows  some  results  of  this  study  that
has,  in  fact,  followed  students  for  some  time.  This  particular  slide
shows that in general, students are no more likely to like or dislike
science and mathematics than they are their other subjects. In fact,
that’s what these scores all represent. They are basically the same
across all of the disciplines. This is for students in the eighth, tenth
and twelfth grade as the slide indicates.

The  LSAY,  though,  has  also  followed  students  into  their  college
years.  Consider  the  results  for  students  who  were  traced  from  the
time  they  were  sophomores  into  their  college  years.  These  are  stu-
dents  who  were  asked  in  the  tenth  grade  about  whether  they  had
some  interest  in  science,  no  interest  in  science,  all  the  way  up  to
liking science and the extent of their interest. Those who expressed
the highest interest in science, those receiving a score of four were,
in  fact,  more  likely  to  choose  majors  in  the  STEM  areas  in  college
than were other students.

But  what  is  quite  interesting  is  that  few  of  the  students  in  any
of  the  interest  groups  were  inclined  to  major  in  the  sciences.  This
is  a  part  of  the  evidence  that  attitudes  alone  do  not  shape  career
trajectories.  There  are  things  in  addition  that  must  be  considered.
This leads us, then, into the importance that teachers and teach-
ing must have. In fact, the findings on teachers have redirected our
attention away from the attributes of teachers to the teaching con-
ditions  that  affect  student  learning.  We  are  now  much  more  con-
cerned  about  how  and  what  students  learn  than  simply  about  the
background of teachers.

Let  me  give  just  one  example  from  a  study.  This  is  a  study  the
Foundation  has  supported,  Learning  Mathematics  for  Teaching  or
LMT.  The  study  developed  an  instrument  to  measure  the  knowl-
edge  and  skills  of  teachers.  It  then  measured  the  performance  in
mathematics  of  the  students  of  those  teachers.  The  outcome:  the
higher  the  performance  of  the  teachers  on  that  particular  test,  the
better  the  scores  of  the  students  on  the  test  that  they  were  given.
This  held  up  even  when  the  study  took  account  of  differences  in
the  performance  of  students  on  prior  tests  and  differences  in  the
background of teachers. When we see then that the kind of knowl-
edge  that  the  teachers  have  can  translate  into  the  performance  of
students, a question becomes, what enhances the knowledge of the
teachers themselves?

It is now evident that professional development programs can be
designed  to  advance  learning  by  teachers  and  as  a  consequence
have demonstrable effects on student learning. Yet, I suggested it’s
not  enough  to  have  interested  students;  students  must  have  the
qualified  teachers  who  can  enhance  the  learning,  but  that  for
teaching and for the teaching effectiveness we know that resources,
tools and resources make a difference.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

17

NSF  has  in  fact  supported  the  development  of  materials  and  re-
sources  to  accelerate  student  learning.  Those  tools,  in  turn,  have
been  assessed  to  determine  what  is  their  viability  under  different
kinds of conditions.

I’ll just mention a few of the kinds of tools that have been devel-
oped. One is called the Cognitive Tutor. This is actually a software
package  that  provides  personalized  instruction  for  students.  It’s
been  used  very  extensively  in  mathematics  teaching,  and  in  fact
with  the  assessment  we  know  that’s  the  reason  why  the  tutor  has
now  been  introduced  to  over  500,000  students  in  some  2,600
schools across the country.

There  is  also  the  tool  SimCalc  Math  World.  I  know,  quite  a
mouthful.  The  SimCalc  Math  World  has  technical  materials  and
software for teaching core concepts in algebra. Rigorous evaluations
of  the  curriculum  show  how  effective  it  is  in  enhancing  an  under-
standing  particularly  of  complicated  matters  that  students  often
struggle with in algebra, including linear functions.

Finally,  among  the  tools  and  the  assessment  is  Engineering  is
Elementary. This is a curriculum that integrates engineering tech-
nology concepts and skills with elementary science, reading, mathe-
matics, and social studies. And the research has been conducted in
places  that  have  used  Engineering  is  Elementary.  Such  research
has shown that students who use these materials gain in their un-
derstanding of engineering and science concepts and especially they
come to understand a lot better what engineers actually do.

In  general,  then,  and  in  conclusion,  what  we  see  from  the  body
of  work  is  that  there  are  the  conditions  that  are  interrelated.  Yet,
there  are  other  things  that  need  to  be  pointed  out.  The  best  of
teachers,  and  the  best  of  resources  cannot  produce  learning  if  stu-
dents are not in the relevant courses.

Recognizing this, one district or state after another has raised re-
quirements  in  mathematics  and  science  for  high  school  students.
And  certainly  Texas  exemplifies  this  trend  of  raising  the  require-
ments.  Noteworthy  too  are  efforts  to  encourage  strong  STEM  con-
tent in the early school years. These efforts echo what we are find-
ing  in  other  nations  whose  students  excel  in  international  math
and  science  comparisons.  In  those  nations,  we  know  that  the  stu-
dents  get  an  introduction  into  the  fundamental  concepts  early  in
their  careers,  early  in  the  school  years;  there  is  no  waiting  until
high school and beyond.

Thus,  the  National  Science  Foundation  stands  ready  to  act  in
partnership  with  all  who  want  to  improve  STEM  education  in  the
United  States.  Our  experiences  show  that  knowledge  can  be  ad-
vanced  through  solid  research,  and  that  knowledge  can  be  used  in
the service of STEM education improvement. We are prepared then
to work in partnership with all who share the goal of ensuring ex-
cellence and quality for STEM education. Thank you.

Mr. HALL. We thank you.
[The prepared statement of Dr. Marrett follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF CORA B. MARRETT

Chairman Gordon, Ranking Member Hall, and Representative Ross, thank you for
inviting  me  to  participate  in  this  hearing  on  science,  technology,  engineering  and
mathematics  (STEM)  education.  The  National  Science  Foundation  (NSF)  is  com-
mitted  to  promoting  excellence  in  STEM  education.  We  are  fortunate  to  have  that

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

18

same level of commitment to excellence from you, as is evident from your legislative
actions and your continued interest in inspiring our youth to pursue STEM careers.
The  hearing  today  reflects  three  overarching  concerns:  (1)  the  conditions  prompt-
ing student interest in and pursuit of careers in science and engineering; (2) the cir-
cumstances  enhancing  excellence  in  teaching  and  learning  in  STEM;  and  (3)  the
tools,  resources,  materials  and  technologies  linked  to  effective  STEM  teaching  and
learning. Over the years, NSF has funded projects addressing all three areas. It has
also  aggregated  information  on  STEM  education,  drawn  from  activities  funded  by
other agencies and foundations as well as by NSF. That information provides a use-
ful  backdrop  for  this  hearing  on  student  interest,  teacher  enhancement,  and  high-
quality resources. This testimony generally does not address the criteria laid out in
the ACC.

What we think we know about students:

• Course-taking,  not  mere  interest,  contributes  to  STEM  learning.  The  comple-
tion  of  challenging  courses  has  links  to  performance,  particularly  on  tests  of
achievement. The evidence is especially strong in the case of pre-college math-
ematics.

• Enrollment in advanced courses during the secondary school years influences

the selection and completion of STEM majors during college.

• Nationally,  the  trend  is  toward  greater  participation  of  secondary  school  stu-

dents in advanced mathematics and science courses.

What we think we know about teachers:

• Students learn more from mathematics and science teachers who have strong
content knowledge and pedagogical skills than they do from teachers who lack
these  attributes.  The  skills  are  more  often  found  among  experienced  than
novice teachers.

• Most  mathematics  and  science  teachers  in  public  middle  and  high  schools

participate in professional development activities.

• Teacher  effectiveness  rises  with  a  less  chaotic  environment,  greater  support
from administrators and colleagues, and more adequate teaching and learning
resources.

Students

NSF’s STEM education research and development portfolio underpins these over-
all  general  findings  and  offers  insights  into  the  processes  under-girding  them.  The
Longitudinal Study of American Youth (LSAY) is quite relevant to the issue of stu-
dent  interest,  performance,  and  achievement.  Launched  in  1989,  the  LSAY  has
tracked  pre-college  students  over  time  to  determine  their  interest  in  mathematics
and science and the subsequent choices they make. Table 1 is a summary of attitude
changes among high school students. It shows that in general students are no more
likely  to  like  or  dislike  science  and  mathematics  than  they  are  other  subjects,  as
evidenced by similar mean scores.

The LSAY results suggest a positive relationship between an individual’s attitude
toward science during high school and choice of a STEM major in college (see Table
2).  The  level  of  interest  in  science  was  assessed  among  students  in  grade  10,  and
their  college  major  determined  subsequently.  Those  expressing  the  highest  level  of

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

19

interest  (score:  4)  were  more  likely  to  have  chosen  a  STEM  major  than  were  stu-
dents uninterested (score: 0) in science. It is worth noting that most students chose
non-STEM  majors,  regardless  of  the  evaluations  of  science  they  had  made  earlier.
Attitudes alone do not shape career trajectories.

Based on our experience we believe that persistence in a STEM major is affected

by:

matics can reach mastery levels;

• Bridge  programs  in  the  summer  before  the  first  year  of  college  to  enable  at-
risk students to gain the academic skills necessary to compete successfully at
the college level;
• Changes  in  pedagogy  and  content  of  first-year  STEM  gateway  courses  that
allow  all  students  to  master  content  and  improve  their  ability  to  think  criti-
cally and independently;
• Redesign of early mathematics sequences so that students deficient in mathe-
• Opportunities  for  first-  and  second-year  undergraduates  to  participate  in  au-
• Initiatives  that  provide  students  with  advice  about  the  careers  available  to
STEM majors, the kinds of interests and skills required in these careers, and
the preparation necessary for the careers; and
• Mentoring  programs  involving  both  peer  mentoring  and  faculty  mentoring
that  encourage  students  to  continue  with  their  majors  and  that  provide  indi-
vidualized  guidance  for  navigating  through  these  demanding  STEM  majors.

thentic research;

Teachers

NSF  has  invested  heavily  in  research  and  development  programs  to  improve  the
knowledge, skills, and performance of teachers at all levels. Initial NSF results show
that  others  have  picked  up  this  research  and  have  investigated  at  large  scale  such
as  ExxonMobil  mentioned  below.  The  investments  are  particularly  noteworthy  in
reference to professional development.

Efforts  to  gauge  the  impacts  of  professional  development  have  been  constrained
by a lack of instruments to measure teacher knowledge. Attempts to understand the
relationship  between  teacher  knowledge  and  student  learning  have  been  similarly
limited. To address this need, the NSF’s Math and Science Partnership program has
funded  many  projects  such  as  the  examples  below  that  have  produced  measures  of
knowledge that are being used widely.

The  Assessing  Teacher  Learning  About  Science  Teaching  (ATLAST)  project  is
such  an  example.  The  project  developed  a  program  on  force  and  motion  for  high
school  teachers  and  a  test  (ATLAST)  to  measure  teacher  learning  of  the  funda-
mental  concepts.  Subsequently,  the  teachers  tested  their  ninth  grade  physics  stu-
dents  before  the  students  were  taught  the  concepts  and  reassessed  them  following
a  unit  of  instruction.  The  outcome:  the  higher  the  teacher’s  score,  the  greater  the
change in the scores of their students. ATLAST warrants attention not only because
it fosters and measures learning by teachers, but also because it relates such learn-
ing to the performance of students.

On  mathematics  learning,  the  study,  Learning  Mathematics  for  Teaching  (LMT),
merits  notice.  The  study  developed  an  instrument  called  Mathematical  Knowledge
for Teaching (MKT) to measure the mathematical knowledge and skills of teachers.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

20

It then tested the performance of the students. The outcome revealed a positive rela-
tionship between the performance of the teacher on the MKT test and the perform-
ance  of  his  or  her  students.  This  outcome  was  obtained  even  when  the  study  took
into  account  the  performance  of  the  students  on  prior  tests  and  differences  in  the
backgrounds of the teachers and their schools. The LMT study later videotaped les-
sons from mathematics classrooms and scored the quality of the instruction, as evi-
dent  in  the  absence  of  mathematical  errors,  the  use  of  mathematical  justifications
and  explanations,  and  the  teachers’  skill  in  representing  the  work  of  students.  The
instruction  judged  to  be  of  higher  quality  occurred  among  teachers  with  higher
scores on mathematical knowledge for teaching.

The  LMT  study  reinforces  a  result  other  research  has  uncovered:  teaching  effec-
tiveness  depends  on  an  ability  to  translate  knowledge  into  quality  experiences  for
students. One such investigation comes from the Alliance for Improvement of Math-
ematics  Skills,  Pre-K–16,  a  partnership  that  includes  Del  Mar  Community  College,
Texas  A&M  University–Kingsville,  and  nine  independent  school  districts  in  South
Texas.  Over  a  two-year  period,  approximately  250  teachers  participated  in  more
than  30  hours  of  professional  development,  typically  through  mathematics-focused
institutes.  An  observational  study  of  teachers  who  participated  in  the  institutes
showed  a  sharp  decrease  in  their  use  of  ‘‘teacher-directed’’  instruction  (lecture)  in
favor  of  a  more  ‘‘student-centered’’  learning  environment.  Such  an  environment  re-
lated positively to measures of student engagement.

A project funded at the University of Miami offers possibilities for closing the gaps
still found in achievement between population groups. The program provided teach-
ers with professional development workshops, and new mathematics and science in-
structional materials designed for English language learners. Measures taken before
and  after  the  instruction  showed  changes  in  science  achievement  that  reached  sta-
tistical  significance.  Likewise,  performance  in  mathematics,  measured  on  a  state-
wide  mathematics  test,  indicated  greater  improvement  for  the  students  given  the
specialized  instruction  than  for  a  comparison  group.  It  should  be  noted  that  both
groups consisted overwhelmingly of students from economically disadvantaged back-
grounds.

Additional  NSF  programs  designed  to  strengthen  STEM  teaching  include  Dis-
covery  Research  K–12,  with  its  emphasis  on  improving  knowledge  about  teaching
and learning; Geoscience Teacher Training (GEO–Teach), created to identify strate-
gies  of  effective  pre-  and  in-service  preparation  for  Earth  science  teachers;  and  the
Physics Teacher Education Coalition, a project focused on increasing the quality and
numbers  of  teachers  in  physics  and  other  physical  sciences.  Past  investments  by
NSF  in  teacher  preparation  have  led  to  new  models,  such  as  the  UTeach  program
at  the  University  of  Texas,  now  being  replicated  with  ExxonMobil  support.  This
model  gives  center-stage  to  master  K–12  teachers  who  take  the  lead  in  designing
and teaching pre-service courses.

Tools

NSF  funded  research  has  produced  materials  and  resources  to  accelerate  student
learning. Those materials in turn have been assessed in educational settings at var-
ious  scales  as  noted  below,  to  determine  their  viability  as  classroom  tools.  Among
the tools NSF has supported are:

• The  Cognitive  Tutor,  a  software  package  that  provides  personalized  instruc-
tion for the individual student. The development work on The Cognitive Tutor
began in 1980 and continued into 2003 funded through more than 20 awards
from  programs  across  the  Foundation.  Tutors  using  the  software  are  now
reaching  over  500,000  students  in  2600  schools.  Evaluations,  using  very  rig-
orous designs to assess impact, have shown that the tutors do in fact improve
learning. Indeed, the consistently replicated results have made The Cognitive
Tutor  one  of  only  a  few  approaches  the  Department  of  Education  includes  in
its  What  Works  Clearinghouse.  Importantly,  the  positive  effects  appear  in
rural as well as urban settings, in schools with at-risk students and more ad-
vantaged  ones,  and  among  honors  students  in  addition  to  English  language
learners.
• SimCalc  Math  World,  consists  of  text  materials  and  software  for  computers,
and  calculators  for  teaching  core  algebra  concepts.  SimCalc  has  its  roots  in
research funded by the Directorate for Computer and Information Sciences in
1980. The software development began with an award granted in 1993. In the
summer  of  2005,  SRI  International  began  a  rigorously  designed  randomized
controlled  experiment  with  151  7th  and  8th  grade  teachers  and  thousands  of
students  from  all  over  Texas.  The  project  compared  a  SimCalc  replacement
to  existing  7th-  and  8th-grade  pre-algebra  curricula.  In  both  grades,  the  use

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

21

of  the  SimCalc  curriculum  and  technology  resulted  in  greater  student  learn-
ing gains, especially for advanced aspects of proportionality, rates, and linear
functions that are required for further STEM learning. The findings were ro-
bust across variations in regional demographics, school poverty levels, student
ethnicity  and  gender,  and  with  teachers  having  differing  attitudes,  beliefs,
and backgrounds.
Students  of  teachers  who  implemented  SimCalc’s  integrated  curriculum  and
software  materials  learned  more  advanced  mathematics  than  did  students
given  other  instructional  materials.  The  project’s  findings  demonstrate  how
society  can  harness  the  dynamic  capabilities  of  technology  to  expand  access
to  advanced  mathematics,  and  accelerate  students’  progress  towards  STEM
careers.

• Engineering  is  Elementary,  a  curriculum  for  elementary  school  students,  was
developed  by  the  informal  science  community.  The  curriculum  integrates  en-
gineering  and  technology  concepts  and  skills  with  elementary  science  topics.
In  addition,  it  has  connections  with  reading  skills,  mathematics,  and  social
studies.  Studies  show  that  children  using  the  Engineering  is  Elementary  ma-
terials  gain  in  their  understanding  of  engineering  and  science  topics,  com-
pared to children not using the materials. In addition, children in the experi-
mental  group  come  to  know  what  engineers  do  and  what  technology  entails.
The  curriculum  and  the  research  associated  with  it  delve  into  an  area  ex-
plored only infrequently: how children at young ages think about engineering
concepts.  The  body  of  work  not  only  illuminates  this  area,  but  also  outlines
ways  in  which  teachers  can  draw  upon  the  knowledge  and  assumptions  chil-
dren possess. Initial research suggests that this approach has been successful
in helping young children envision themselves as engineers.

I  have  presented  thus  far  projects  and  outcomes  centered  on  STEM  learning  in
formal  settings.  But  NSF  recognizes  and  supports  work  in  the  informal  sector  as
well.  For  example,  a  museum-based  enrichment  program  tracked  past  participants
who  had  completed  at  least  one  year  of  the  program  between  1992  and  1997,  and
found that for the people pursuing careers in health and other STEM fields, mentors
and  exposure  to  job  skills  were  key  elements  to  their  job  choice.  With  this  finding
in  mind,  29  Innovative  Technology  Experiences  for  Students  and  Teachers  (ITEST)
projects currently match students with mentors, and all ITEST projects offer oppor-
tunities  to  develop  job  skills  that  students  can  take  with  them  beyond  the  ITEST
experience. Informal Science and Education (ISE) youth projects also use this strat-
egy to build student exposure to STEM careers.

NSF  takes  pride  in  the  work  that  it  has  supported  and  the  gains  in  student  and
teacher  learning  that  are  a  result  of  those  investments.  However,  there  is  substan-
tially more work to be undertaken. To ensure continued progress, NSF stands ready
to  act  in  partnership  with  other  federal  agencies,  such  as  the  Department  of  Edu-
cation, business and industry, professional associations and of course, policy-makers.
The quality teaching and learning that the Nation needs—that our youth need—de-
pend on us all.

BIOGRAPHY FOR CORA B. MARRETT

Dr. Cora B. Marrett is the Assistant Director of the Directorate for Education and
Human  Resources  (EHR)  at  the  National  Science  Foundation  (NSF).  She  leads  the
NSF’s  mission  to  achieve  excellence  in  U.S.  science,  technology,  engineering  and
mathematics  (STEM)  education  with  oversight  of  a  budget  of  approximately  $825
million  and  a  staff  of  150.  EHR  is  the  principal  source  of  federal  support  for
strengthening STEM education through education research and development (R&D).
Dr.  Marrett  currently  co-chairs  the  Subcommittee  on  science,  technology,  engi-
neering  and  mathematics  Education  of  the  National  Science  and  Technology  Coun-
cil, Committee on Science.

Prior to her appointment at the NSF, Dr. Marrett served as the Senior Vice Presi-
dent for Academic Affairs in the University of Wisconsin System. Her NSF position
is  in  conjunction  with  the  UW–Madison  Department  of  Sociology,  where  she  re-
mains a tenured faculty member.

Earlier, she held the post of Senior Vice Chancellor for Academic Affairs and Pro-

vost at the University of Massachusetts–Amherst.

Her  current  position  represents  a  return  to  NSF.  She  served  at  NSF  as  the  first
Assistant  Director  of  the  Directorate  for  Social,  Behavioral  and  Economic  Sciences.
She  received  the  NSF’s  Distinguished  Service  Award  for  her  leadership  in  devel-
oping  new  research  programs  and  articulating  the  scientific  projects  of  the  direc-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

22

torate.  Dr.  Marrett  also  served  as  the  initial  chair  of  the  Committee  on  Equal  Op-
portunities in Science and Engineering (CEOSE).

In  addition  to  her  faculty  appointment  at  the  University  of  Wisconsin–Madison,
she  has  been  a  faculty  member  at  the  University  of  North  Carolina  and  Western
Michigan University.

Dr.  Marrett  holds  a  B.A.  degree  from  Virginia  Union  University,  and  M.A.  and
Ph.D. degrees from UW–Madison. She has an honorary doctorate from Wake Forest
University.  She  is  a  Fellow  of  the  American  Association  for  the  Advancement  of
Science, the American Academy of Arts and Sciences, and Sigma Xi, the Science Re-
search Society.

Dr. Marrett received the Erich Bloch Distinguished Service Award from the Qual-
ity  Education  for  Minorities  (QEM)  Network,  given  annually  to  an  individual  who
has made singular contributions to the advancement of science and to the participa-
tion  of  groups  under-represented  in  science,  technology,  engineering  and  mathe-
matics.  She  is  widely  published  in  the  field  of  sociology,  and  has  held  a  number  of
public and professional service positions.

Mr. HALL. At this time we’ll hear from Mr. James Henry Russell.

Stay as close to the five minutes as you possibly can.
STATEMENT  OF  MR.  JAMES  HENRY  RUSSELL,  SUPER-
INDEPENDENT

INTENDENT  OF  SCHOOLS,  TEXARKANA 
SCHOOL DISTRICT, TEXARKANA, TEXAS
Mr. RUSSELL. Yes, sir.
Ranking  Member  Hall,  Chairman  Gordon  and  Congressman
Ross,  what  a  privilege  it  is  to  be  here  today.  Not  only  to  testify,
but  what  a  privilege  this  whole  day  has  been  for  the  Texarkana
Independent  School  District  and  so  many  of  the  great  things  we
have  going  on  here.  Not  just  here  but  in  this  community.  As  Con-
gressman Hall mentioned earlier, I have been Superintendent now
for  a  year  and  my  mentor  and  trainer  for  the  last  ten  years  has
been Dr. Larry Sullivan.

I’ll  give  you  a  warning  sign  of  when  you  have  great  things  com-
ing  in  a  community.  About  four  years  ago,  Dr.  Sullivan  and  Dr.
Steven  Hensley,  President  of  TAMU–Texarkana,  started  having
lunch  together  quite  often.  For  the  staff  that  works  under  them,
that can be a scary thing because while they are great leaders and
visionaries,  they’re  also  great  delegators,  and  we  knew  there  was
quite a bit of work to come.

People keep asking how this school district appeared, and I’ll tell
you it is because of these two great visionary leaders, the incredible
Morriss family that made such a generous donation, and an entire
community  that  not  only  supported  this  school  district  along  with
everything  else—our  community  demands  this  type  of  school  dis-
trict.

We  talk  about  importance  of  STEM  education  and  why  it’s  im-
portant. I really enjoyed reading Bill Gates’ testimony earlier talk-
ing  about  the  two  million  new  jobs  that  will  be  created  in  the  fu-
ture. It is our job to make sure the students of today are ready for
those  two  million  jobs  that  are  coming  in  the  future.  STEM  in  our
Texarkana  community  is  really  doing  well.  We  actually  started  off
at  the  high  school  level  a  few  years  ago.  In  fact,  the  Dean  of  the
Engineering Program at TAMU–Texarkana, Dr. Doug Green, start-
ed  teaching  classes  at  Texas  High  School.  The  classes  then  moved
to  Morriss  Elementary  last  August.  That  started  last  August,
which  you’re  seeing  today.  Then  starting  off  this  fall  we  will  be
starting  with  our  sixth  grade  at  a  part  of  the  academy  of  Texas
Middle School, so it has STEM in Texas I.S.D. as well.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

23

Motivation  is  how  we  got  to  this  school.  My  favorite  professor,
Dr.  Rosanne  Stripling  to  my  left,  always  taught  me  about  motiva-
tion  and  that  you  must  have  the  needs  of  the  community  if  you’re
going  to  be  successful.  So,  we  started  with  a  Blue  Ribbon  Com-
mittee  several  months  ago  and  found  there  was  definitely  a  need
for more engineers and more mathematicians, not only in this com-
munity but in this world. So, we had that grass roots support from
the start, and it wasn’t hard to build and move forward.

Keeping students motivated in STEM, well I think you have just
done  that  for  us  today.  Among  the  396  students  that  all  of  you
have  touched  today,  I  guarantee  you  each  of  these  kids  is  going
home today wanting to be an astronaut or mathematician or a sci-
entist and believing that they can be. This is so important with our
students today, and we know they can do this.

One of the major problems that limit the performance of students
and  teachers  is  finding  qualified  science  and  math  teachers  that
will  come  to  your  schools  and  stay  in  your  schools  is  a  huge  issue.
There  are  so  many  opportunities  in  the  corporate  world  it’s  really
hard  for  school  districts  to  compete  to  find  these  master  teachers,
and  as  we  all  know  your  staff  is  what  gets  things  done.  Teachers
that  love  to  teach  and  have  the  passion  and  drive  and  competence
in  this  area  is,  in  my  opinion,  the  key  number  one  issue.  Moti-
vating  the  kids  is  really  not  hard.  You  just  need  the  facilities,  the
teachers and the programs.

Some  important  things  that  the  Federal  Government  has  done
and  can  do,  providing  a  grant  for  another  top-notch  facility  like
this,  we  definitely  would  not  turn  down.  We  are  proud  to  say  this
facility  was  totally  built  with  local  money,  and  we  did  not  raise
taxes  to  do  it.  So,  there’s  no  federal  money  involved  here.  It  was
a  local  effort,  and  we’re  proud  of  the  facility.  The  Federal  Govern-
ment  has  been  instrumental  in  different  teacher  training.  You
heard Dr. Marrett mention that.

Again,  our  teachers  are  so  important  in  making  sure  that  we
have  the  top  ones.  It  is  very  important.  And  also  curriculum.  The
National  Science  Foundation  supports  the  Museum  of  Science  in
Boston. Actually, if you walked around the school today, you would
see  curriculum  from  the  Museum  of  Science  in  Boston  funded
through  the  National  Science  Foundation  at  work.  We  just  placed
a large order and we could use more and more.

We  have  all  sorts  of  cooperative  programs  with  A&M  on  devel-
oping  curriculum.  Dr.  Stripling,  I  know,  will  talk  about  that  more.
Dr. David Allen who is probably in the room today, has a lot of in-
strumental programs that help train our teachers.

I’m  going  to  move  to  my  closing  now  and  stay  close  to  that  five
minutes,  and  I’m  actually  going  to  stray  away  from  STEM  for  just
a  minute.  Rick  Sandlin  is  another  key  reason  why  this  school  has
been  so  successful;  his  is  a  great  individual  and  has  a  great  staff.
I’ve got seven other elementary principals sitting behind me that
are  just  having  to  hold  onto  their  chairs  to  keep  from  standing  up
and screaming, come see what I’m doing in various other areas.

What  we  need  is  great  education.  What  we  need  are  passionate
good  leaders  and  passionate  good  teachers  to  show  the  kids  that
they can do absolutely anything. Give those basic skills. Align with
a  great  college  like  Texas  A&M  University,  so  the  kids  see  much

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

24

farther  than  today.  So,  in  closing,  again,  thank  you  so  much  for
being here. Thank you for honoring us and our kids. Thank you for
showing our kids what their future can be if they continue to work
hard.  I’ll  be  happy  to  answer  any  questions.  The  real  experts  are
sitting  not  too  close  behind  me  to  whisper  me  the  answers  when
I need it.

Mr. HALL. They’re good to have, aren’t they?
[The prepared statement of Mr. Russell follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JAMES HENRY RUSSELL

1. What is the overall state of STEM education in Texarkana?

We are excited about science, technology, engineering, and mathematics education
in the Texarkana Independent School District. Our goal is to offer challenging math-
ematics  and  engineering  concepts  by  providing  a  rigorous  and  seamless  STEM  cur-
riculum.

The  Martha  and  Josh  Morriss  Mathematics  and  Engineering  Elementary  School
is  a  state-of-the-art  facility  that  serves  as  a  national  model  for  how  young  children
can become engaged and educated in mathematics and engineering.

At  Texas  Middle  School  we  will  provide  these  opportunities  through  our  new
Math,  Science,  and  Engineering  Academy.  This  academy,  designed  for  sixth  grade
students, is a model that will be extended to seventh and eighth grades during the
next two years.

Students  at  Texas  High  School  may  earn  both  high  school  and  college  credits  in
a  myriad  of  courses,  including  38  semester  credit  hours  in  math,  science,  and  engi-
neering.

The following value-added elements are included in our STEM program:

Technological Literacy and the Museum of Science, Boston;

• Engineering  Encounters/Academy  Showcases—cross  grade  level,  theme-based
authentic  assessment  projects  completed  and  presented  by  students  to  the
public;
• An  engaging  engineering  curriculum  supported  by  the  National  Center  for
• A  math  curriculum  in  which  the  K–8th  grade  and  Algebra  I  Texas  Essential
• Dual  credit  courses,  including  advanced  mathematics,  science,  and  engineer-
• Extended  school-year  enrichment  activities,  such  as  a  two-week  summer  Cir-

Knowledge and Skills (TEKS) are accelerated;

ing;

cuitry Camp and after-school Robotics.

Why  is  it  important  for  all  students  to  achieve  proficiency  in  these  sub-
jects?

In  an  increasingly  technological  society,  it  is  imperative  for  students  to  achieve
proficiency  in  science,  technology,  engineering,  and  mathematics.  Student  pro-
ficiency is necessary to close the gap between participation and success in secondary
and higher education in a manner that effectively addresses a growing professional
and career demand. As Bill Gates recently testified before the House Committee on
Science  and  Technology,  statistics  project  two  million  job  openings  in  science,  tech-
nology, engineering, and mathematics-related fields by 2014. The decline in students
pursuing STEM-related careers could stifle innovation and economic growth. In the
words  of  the  STEM  Education  Coalition,  ‘‘We  believe  that  excellence  in  STEM  edu-
cation  at  all  levels,  among  all  populations,  is  vital  to  our  nation’s  long-term  eco-
nomic prosperity, global competitiveness, and homeland security.’’
2. What  was  the  motivation  behind  establishing  the  Martha  and  Josh

Morriss Mathematics and Engineering Elementary School?
A  growing  gap  between  the  supply  and  demand  for  professionals  in  engineering
and  mathematics  careers  has  alerted  stakeholders  across  the  Nation.  At  the  na-
tional  level,  resolution  of  this  dilemma  has  been  identified  as  a  federal  priority  via
appropriation  of  the  Science,  Technology,  Engineering,  and  Mathematics  (STEM)
project  and  the  American  Competitiveness  Initiative  unveiled  by  President  Bush  in
his January 2006 State of the Union Address. Texas Senator Kay Bailey Hutchison
publicly  recognized  the  growing  need  for  engineering  education  and  research  in
Texas when she announced the creation of the Texas Academy of Science, Engineer-
ing, and Medicine in San Antonio in January 2004. The regional need for more engi-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

25

neers  was  documented  in  the  late  1990s  when  Texarkana  area  businesses  (e.g.,
International Paper, Domtar Paper Mill, and Alcoa) identified the need for an engi-
neering program at Texas A&M–Texarkana as the number one community priority.
The  need  for  more  regionally  available  engineers,  coupled  with  the  need  for  an  in-
crease  in  the  quantity  and  quality  of  United  States  grown  and  educated  engineers,
sparked the development of the Texas A&M University–Texarkana—Texarkana ISD
K–16 Engineering Collaborative.

Although the effectiveness of a K–16 engineering collaborative as a means of ame-
liorating  the  supply  and  demand  gap  of  engineers  is  a  very  logical,  research-based
approach,  a  comprehensive  search  has  not  identified  another  partnership  of  this
kind  across  the  United  States.  The  Texas  A&M  University–Texarkana—Texarkana
ISD  K–16  Engineering  Collaborative  is  a  unique,  sustainable,  and  replicable  model
that sets a gold standard for public schools and universities.
What  role  did  parents,  the  community  and  local  businesses  play  in  the  es-
tablishment of this school?

In  January  2005,  Texarkana  ISD  convened  the  first  meeting  of  the  Blue  Ribbon
Committee, a group of parents, community and business leaders, and school district
representatives. This panel’s purpose was to review the school district’s facilities, fi-
nances,  and  curriculum,  and  to  make  recommendations  concerning  future  plans  for
the  district.  Following  a  series  of  planning  sessions,  the  committee  recommended
the  establishment  of  a  new  elementary  school,  a  school  that  would  become  a  na-
tional  model  for  K–16  collaboration  in  how  young  children  can  become  engaged  in
and educated for careers in mathematics and engineering.

The first concrete step to this concept becoming a reality occurred in spring 2006
when the Josh Morriss, Jr. family donated 10.6 acres of land near the new 375 acre
Texas A&M–Texarkana campus site for the new elementary school.

Along with the contributions of the Blue Ribbon Committee and the Josh Morriss,
Jr.  family,  Texas  A&M  University–Texarkana  became  an  integral  partner  in  the
school’s  development.  The  University’s  involvement  included  consultation  in  the
floor  plan  and  architectural  design,  in  integrated  curriculum  development,  and  in
professional development for teachers.
Is there a plan in place to keep these students motivated in STEM subjects
as they make the transition to middle school and on to high school?

Texas  A&M  University–Texarkana  and  Texarkana  Independent  School  District
have established a vertically aligned kindergarten–16 engineering education collabo-
rative that will be executed at four levels:

1) A K–5 public elementary school (Martha and Josh Morriss Mathematics and
Engineering  Elementary  School)  that  provides  a  mathematics  and  pre-engi-
neering  integrated  curriculum,  Engineering  Encounters  (student-led,  hands-
on  experiences  shared  with  parents  and  the  community),  and  pre-engineer-
ing  thematic  units  (i.e.,  structures,  forces,  and  gears)  at  each  grade  level
(opened in fall 2007)

2) The  Math,  Science,  and  Engineering  Academy,  a  pre-engineering  school-

within-a-school at Texas Middle School (planned for fall 2008)

3) Selected  mathematics  and  science  courses  with  pre-engineering  content  en-
richment  and  dual  credit  engineering  courses  at  Texas  High  School  (fall
2006)

4) A choice of three engineering related programs of study at Texas A&M–Tex-
arkana:  BS  in  Computer  and  Information  Sciences  (fall  2005),  BS  in  Elec-
trical Engineering (planned for fall 2008), and BS in Mechanical Engineering
(planned for fall 2010).

3. What are the major problems that limit the performance of students and
teachers,  and  what  do  you  feel  is  the  single,  most  important  step  that
the Federal Government should take to improve K–12th grade math and
science education?
The major problems that limit the performance of students and teachers in STEM
education are centered around the lack of educational focus on STEM. Traditionally,
teacher  training  in  STEM  has  been  limited;  therefore,  teachers  often  do  not  have
confidence  in  their  own  STEM  background  knowledge  and  skills.  This  limitation
leads  to  a  deficiency  in  student  awareness  and  interest  in  STEM  career  fields.  In
addition,  instructional  resources  for  STEM  courses  are  costly,  and  funding  is  mini-
mal. Finally, very few, if any, national models of successful, aligned STEM programs
exist.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

26

The most important step the Federal Government should take to improve K–12th
grade  math  and  science  education  is  to  provide  strong  support  for  STEM  teacher
professional  development.  Research  consistently  shows  that  the  single  most  impor-
tant factor in student achievement is teacher quality. We urge the Federal Govern-
ment to provide grants and other financial assistance directly to school districts and
to  other  public  educational  entities  that  have  identified  needs  and  priorities  in  the
area of STEM education.
What  involvement  have  you  had  with  math  and  science  education  pro-
grams at the National Science Foundation or other federal agencies as well
as those in the State of Texas?

The  Texarkana  Independent  School  District  has  been  involved  with  the  following

STEM programs:

• East  Texas  Regional  Collaborative  for  Excellence  in  Science  Teach-
ing—a continuing project funded since 1997; offered through grants from the
Texas Regional Collaboratives for Excellence in Science Teaching

• Teacher-to-Teacher  Initiative—designed  by  teachers  for  teachers  in  order
to provide technical support, professional development opportunities, and rec-
ognition for teachers of all content areas and grade levels; offered through the
U.S. Department of Education
• The East Texas STEM Center—a  federal  program  designed  to  improve  in-
struction  and  academic  performance  in  science-  and  math-related  subjects  at
Texas high schools; offered through a T–STEM federal grant
• The Teacher Quality Grants Program—a federally funded effort providing
grants  to  higher  education  institutions  and  nonprofit  organizations;  offered
through  the  Texas  Higher  Education  Coordinating  Board  and  the  Charles  A.
Dana Center

What are the most important and effective components of these programs?
These  programs  focus  on  sustained  professional  development  in  both  STEM  con-
tent  and  in  research-based  instructional  strategies  for  teachers.  All  three  programs
rely  on  federal  and  State  funding  to  provide  opportunities  for  professional  develop-
ment.  The  programs  provide  crucial  support  for  teachers  in  preparing  students  for
college and for entry into STEM career fields.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

27

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

28

BIOGRAPHY FOR JAMES HENRY RUSSELL

EDUCATION

– Superintendent Certification, Summer 2005
– Principal Certification. anticipated December 2004
– Masters  in  Education  Administration,  anticipated  December  2004–Texas

A&M University, Texarkana

– Certified Public Account (CPA) Certification, 1994
– BBA in Accounting, 1992–Texas A&M University, College Station, Texas

EMPLOYMENT
Texarkana  Independent  School  District,  4241  Summerhill  Road,  Texarkana,
TX; 903.794.3651

Texarkana ISD is an urban school district located on the Texas–Arkansas border.
The District has seven elementary campuses, one middle school, and one high school
with a combined student enrollment of approximately 6,000 students, served by over
800 employees.
Formaily  Named  Superintendent  of  Schools  August  14,  2007.  Mr.  Russell  is
a  lifelong  resident  of  Texarkana,  an  honor  graduate  of  Texas  High  School  with  a
Bachelor’s  degree  in  accounting  and  a  Master’s  in  Education  Administration  from
Texas A&M University. He is a Certified Public Accountant with Principal and Su-
perintendent Certifications. He began his career with TISD in August 1994 as Food
Services  Comptroller.  A  year  later,  he  moved  into  the  position  of  Director  of  Pur-
chasing  for  three  years,  following  by  Directors  of  Purchasing  &  Support  Services
where  he  remained  until  2003  when  he  was  named  Assistant  Superintendent  for
Business  &  Support  Services.  He  was  named  Deputy  Superintendent  in  October
2006.
Assistant  Superintendent  for  Business  and  Support  Operations—(May  2003  to  Octo-
ber 2006)

– Generate and manage an annual budget in excess of $40 million
– Manage  all  financial  resources  of  the  school  district,  including  cash  flow  and

investment system, debt financing

– Supervise  all  business  and  support  operations  with  the  following  depart-
ments:  Purchasing,  Accounting,  Technology,  Transportation,  Maintenance,
Security/Police,  Management  Information  Systems  (MIS).  Food  Service,  and
Security/Police—consisting of over 400 employees

– Direct  all  district  construction  projects,  including  current  additions  and  im-

provements to Texas High School ($13 million)

– Serve  on  the  Superintendent’s  Cabinet  in  an  advisory  role  for  all  district  op-

erations and long-range planning

Director of Purchasing and Support Operations—(February 1998 to May 2003)

– Supervised  Maintenance,  Transportation,  Food  Service,  Security,  Custodial

and Grounds Departments

– Managed the district warehouse inventory system and central warehouse op-

eration

– Oversaw $30 million in construction projects including the new Texas Middle
School  ($25  million)  and  improvements  and  additions  to  seven  elementary
campuses ($9 million)

– Participated  in  the  development,  implementation  and  management  of  a

health benefit trust and partially self-insured health plan

– Developed  a  profit-oriented  venture  with  other  school  districts  to  operate

their food service division

Director  of  Purchasing  and  Food  Service  Comptroller—(December  1994  to  February
1998)

– Supervised the Food Service department
– Developed district purchasing guide
– Responsible for all district purchasing activities
– Automated warehouse inventory system
– Negotiated with vendors for cost savings and efficiency

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

29

Food Service Comptroller—(August 1994 to December 1994)

– Implemented district-wide point-of-sale system
– Instituted computerized inventory system
– Generated monthly financial statements by campus
– Developed accounting control system

Thomas & Thomas, Certified Public Accounts and Regional Accounting Firm
Staff Accountant—(June 1992 to August 1994)

– Conducted  audits  for  corporations  and  for-profit  and  non-profit  organizations
– Prepared corporate and personal tax returns
– Consulted with businesses on financial efficiency and tax laws

CIVIC AND PROFESSIONAL, ORGANIZATIONS
CURRENT
Texarkana Chamber of Commerce—President Elect
Texarkana Chamber of Commerce—Board of Directors Member
Texarkana Community Foundation—Youth Advisory Council Adult Sponsor
Texas Association of Public Schools—Board Member
Williams  Memorial  Methodist  Church—Chairman,  Board  of  Trustees  and  Member,

Building

Committee and Finance Committee
Leadership Texarkana—Board of Directors Member
American Institute of Certified Public Accounts—Member
Texas Society of Certified Public Accounts—Member

FORMER
Oaklawn Rotary Club—President
Greater United Way of Texarkana—Chairman
Awareness of Crime—Board Member
United Way of Texarkana—Executive Board Member
Texarkana Junior League—Advisory Board Member
Today’s Youth, Tomorrow’s Leaders—Curriculum Chairman, two years
Texarkana Volunteer Center—Board Member
American Heartwalk and Relay for Life—Logistics Chairman
Susan G. Komen Texarkana Race for the Cure—Volunteer
Leadership Texarkana—Graduate
Girl Scouts of Conifer Council—Advisory Board Member

COLLEGE ORGANIZATIONS
Beta Gamma Sigma—Business Administration Honor Society
Beta Alpha Psi—National Accounting Honor Fraternity
Accounting Society

PERSONAL INFORMATION

Mr.  Russell  is  married  to  Rosemary  Reed  Russell,  and  they  are  active  members
of  Williams  Memorial  United  Methodist  Church.  Mrs.  Russell  is  also  a  teacher  in
Texarkana ISD. They have three children—Madeline–12, Colleen–9, and Reed–6.

Mr.  HALL.  Okay,  before  I  ask  Rosanne  Stripling  to  begin,  let  me
recognize  others  that  had  a  part  in  bringing  this  day  to  fruition.
Our  mayor  Dr.—Mayor  Brown,  stand  up  please  and  let  us  recog-
nize  you.  Thank  you.  He  was  here.  How  about  our  new  mayor,
Steve Mayo?

VOICE. They’re out working.
Mr.  HALL.  They’re  out  there  cutting  taxes  and  filling  potholes,
Right.  All  right,  Rosanne  Stripling,  you’re  going  to  have  to  give  us

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

30

in  five  minutes  a  good  reference  as  to  where  these  two  gentlemen
are and what they’re doing.

Dr. STRIPLING. That I can’t do.
Mr.  HALL.  Let  me  recognize  you.  Before  we  do,  let  me  recognize
Steven R. Hensley, too, who is our President of Texas A&M. Where
are you, Mr. President?
STATEMENT OF DR. ROSANNE STRIPLING, PROVOST AND VICE
PRESIDENT  FOR  ACADEMIC  AFFAIRS,  TEXAS  A&M  UNIVER-
SITY–TEXARKANA, TEXARKANA, TEXAS
Dr.  STRIPLING.  Chairman  Gordon,  Ranking  Member  Hall,  Con-
gressman Ross. It is indeed a pleasure and an honor to be here this
afternoon  to  engage  in  this  very  important  conversation,  and  spe-
cifically  to  share  with  all  of  you  some  ways  in  which  universities
can  actually  work  with  communities  and  their  public  schools  to
partner—to  effectively  partner  in  achieving  the  stated  goal  of  this
hearing.

One  of  the  components  of  the  Texas  A&M  University  Texarkana
Institutional  mission  is  service  to  the  Northeast  Texas  region.  The
preparation  of  teachers  for  area  schools  was  one  of  the  very  first
manifestations of this commitment and continues to be a major em-
phasis today.

During the past ten to fifteen years, partnerships have grown to
include  new  programs  and  initiatives  as  well  as  the  expansion  of
existing  programs  to  new  size.  Several  examples,  including  those
relating  to  STEM,  are  described  in  my  written  testimony  which  I
know you have a copy of.

One  of  the  most  notable  partnerships,  however,  is  the  regional
and  national  award  winning  Westlawn  Professional  Development
School,  a  collaborative  effort  between  Texarkana  I.S.D.  and  A&M–
Texarkana that have purchased professional, educated preparation
from  a  very  unique,  research-based  medical  model  design.  Success
of  the  Westlawn  PDS  set  the  stage  for  the  university’s  next  major
collaborative  with  the  Texarkana  I.S.D.,  the  Martha  and  Josh
Morriss Elementary School for Mathematics and Engineering.

The three main categories of collaboration between the university
and  the  I.S.D.  were  No.  1,  facility  planning;  No.  2,  integrated  cur-
riculum  development,  and  No.  3,  teacher  training.  Let  me  briefly
describe our collaborative efforts in each of these areas.

A&M–Texarkana engineering faculty work with Texarkana I.S.D.
administrators  and  their  architects  in  the  conceptual  design  of  the
building  providing  consultants,  consultation  regarding  the  size,
proximity and utilization of space, as well as the inclusion of engi-
neering and mathematics value-added elements.

Faculty  and  administration  within  the  College  of  Arts  and
Science  and  Education  worked  collaboratively  with  representatives
from  the  Texarkana  I.S.D.  curriculum  department  to  envision  and
create  a  frame  work  for  the  new  school’s  K–5  curriculum.  After
much  research  and  discussion  the  team  determined  that  the  State
core curriculum would be expanded to include discreet engineering
courses  at  each  grade  level  and  delivered  via  an  integrated  ap-
proach to engineering or mathematics to ensure that those concepts
would be threaded throughout all of the other subjects the students
were taking.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

31

Delivery  of  curriculum  would  be  student-centered  and  project
based, with assessment of student mastery of the curriculum being
heavily  dependent  upon  authentic  performance  measures.  Now,
after  the  integrated  curriculum  is  outlined,  the  Texarkana  I.S.D.
curriculum  specialist  and  the  A&M–Texarkana  faculty  developed
syllabi for two university graduate courses that would be taken by
all Morriss teachers during the summer prior to the opening of the
new  school.  One  course  addressed  the  design  or  the  content  of  the
curriculum.  The  second  course  addressed  the  delivery  or  the  in-
structional  strategies  of  the  integrated  curriculum.  Both  courses
were  taught  by  Texarkana  I.S.D.  curriculum  specialists  who  were
given adjunct faculty status at the university.

Morriss  teachers  receive  credit  for  both  courses  toward  their
Master of Science degrees in curriculum instruction, one of two re-
quirements  of  all  Morriss  teachers  who  didn’t  possess  a  Master’s
degree at the time of their assignment to the school.

The other requirement is attainment of the Texas Master Mathe-
matics Teacher’s certificate, a twelve-semester credit hour program
developed initially by A&M faculty for training of Morriss teachers.
When  fall  of  2007  arrived  there  was  really  no  question  in  any-
body’s  mind  that  the  foundation  for  success  was  in  place,  but  we
also  knew  that  the  implementation  phase  of  the  project  is  always
the most challenging, and that to declare and not deliver would be
worse than never declaring at all.

After what we’ve seen today at this extraordinary school, is there
any doubt in anybody’s mind that shaping our future science, tech-
nology, engineering, and mathematics leaders of tomorrow can’t be
successfully  accomplished  through  the  delivery  of  a  rigorous  cur-
riculum  in  the  primary  grades  that  initiates  and  sustains  the  en-
gagement,  curiosity  and  excitement  of  young  children  in  science
and of mathematics.

In  closing,  there  is  nothing  profound  or  complex  about  this
replicable  model.  It’s  the  result  of  a  gestalt  of  cooperation,  vision,
tenacity, and courage, the courage to do what we know is required
to offer our children the chance to compete and lead in tomorrow’s
world. Thank you.

Mr. HALL. I’m going to master this thing before everybody leaves.

We’ll recognize Mr. Mike Leherr for five minutes.

Thank you, Dr. Stripling.
[The prepared statement of Dr. Stripling follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF ROSANNE STRIPLING

Texas  A&M  University–Texarkana  has  had  a  long  tradition  of  partnering  with
area  public  schools.  One  of  the  components  of  our  institutional  mission  is  service
to  the  Northeast  Texas  region.  The  preparation  of  teachers  for  area  public  schools
was one of the first manifestations of this commitment and continues to be a major
emphasis.  During  the  past  ten  to  fifteen  years,  partnerships  have  grown  to  include
new programs and initiatives, as well as the expansion of existing programs at new
sites. Noteworthy examples include:

• The  A&M-Texarkana  Center  on  the  Northeast  Texas  Community  College
(NTCC)  in  Mt.  Pleasant  that  provides  upper  division  course  work  for  NTCC
students who want to complete their undergraduate degree and teacher certifi-
cation  program  in  selected  areas.  The  NTCC  Center,  in  its  fifth  year,  offers
students  to  opportunity  to  pursue  a  teaching  certificate  in  EC–4,  EC–4  with
special education, 4–8 mathematics, and high school mathematics. The avail-
able options have broadened to include additional teaching certificates in biol-
ogy and a degree in criminal justice. As a community college, NTCC’s mission

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

32

focuses on serving graduates of local high schools as well as citizens who live
in the Northeast Texas geographical area.
• ‘‘Preparing  Educators  of  Tomorrow’’  (PET),  an  aide-to-teacher  program  at
Hallsville:  The  College  of  Arts  and  Sciences  and  Education  developed  a  part-
nership  with  Kilgore  Community  College  and  public  school  systems  in  the
Longview–Hallsville area for the purpose of assisting school districts to ‘‘grow
their  own’’  teachers.  The  first  cohort  that  graduated  in  2007achieved  a  100
percent  passing  rate  on  the  State  certification  examination  (TExES),  and  the
second cohort is on schedule to graduate in summer 2008. The Hallsville ISD
has  been  a  major  partner  in  this  effort,  as  evidenced  by  the  district  leader-
ship’s  willingness  to  provide  classroom  meeting  space  and  equipment  for  in-
struction.
• Expansion of the master of education degree in education leadership and prin-
cipal  certification  program  to  teachers  in  the  Hallsville  and  Hughes  Springs
areas,  via  a  Web-enhanced  format:  In  the  fall  of  2007,  A&M–Texarkana  ex-
panded  the  existing  Hallsville  partnership  by  adding  a  distance  education
program  in  which  educators  at  areas  schools  can  attain  a  Master’s  degree  in
education  administration  and  principal  certification  via  a  Web-enhanced  for-
mat  involving  face-to-face  seminar  and  on-line  components.  The  purpose  of
this  program  is  to  increase  the  supply  of  quality  principals  for  area  schools.
The Hughes Springs and Hallsville ISDs provide classroom space without cost
to  the  University.  During  spring  2008,  32  students  are  enrolled  in  both  pro-
grams.
• Westlawn  Elementary  Professional  Development  School  (PDS),  a  Texarkana
Independent  School  District  (ISD)  elementary  school  where  A&M–Texarkana
student  teachers  (teacher  interns  employed  by  the  district)  work  with  master
teachers (mentors) in a clinical instructional setting during the fall and spring
semesters  of  the  students’  senior  year.  Two  interns  and  a  master  teacher  at
each  grade  level  (K–5)  are  assigned  to  teach  approximately  45  students  in  a
team  teaching  approach.  An  A&M–Texarkana  faculty  member  is  assigned  to
the  PDS  as  a  university  liaison  on  a  full-time  basis  for  demonstration  teach-
ing, delivery of integrated instruction of the university pedagogy courses that
the  teacher  interns  are  taking  during  their  last  two  semesters,  and  overall
program  supervision  and  management.  The  Westlawn  PDS  won  the  Magna
Award for Teaching Excellence from the National Association of School Boards
and  the  Innovation  in  Teacher  Education  Award  from  the  Southeastern  Re-
gional Association of Teacher Educators in 2005.
• Dual  credit  introductory  engineering  courses  on  the  Texas  High  School  cam-
pus:  A&M–Texarkana  engineering  faculty  have  taught  dual  credit  introduc-
tory engineering courses on the Texas High School campus in the Texarkana
ISD each semester for the past two school years.
• Instructional improvement consultant service to select Texarkana ISD schools:
During  the  2003–04  academic  year,  an  A&M–Texarkana  faculty  member
served  as  the  Technical  Assistance  Provider  (TAP)  to  Dunbar  Intermediate
School,  a  low  performing  Texarkana  ISD  elementary  school  to  provide  con-
sultant  assistance  and  teacher  professional  development.  After  the  selection
and  implementation  of  a  clinical  reading  program,  the  campus  attained  and
as continued to maintain ‘‘Recognized’’ status from the Texas Education Agen-
cy.  The  same  clinical  instruction  was  expanded  to  the  feeder  early  literacy
campus, Theron Jones, the following year with the same exceptional academic
results.
• The Master of Science degree in curriculum and instruction that provides suf-
ficient  flexibility  for  surrounding  school  districts  to  tailor  the  graduate  study
of teachers to meet district needs: The 36 semester credit hour degree program
includes  an  18  hour  curriculum  core  and  18  hours  from  one  to  two  areas  of
concentration agreed upon by the student and advisor. By design, the degree
is  flexible  enough  to  allow  local  area  high  school  teachers  to  acquire  the  18
hours  of  content  within  a  Master’s  degree  that  are  required  to  teach  dual
credit  courses.  Texarkana  ISD  began  immediately  to  scholarship  approxi-
mately  20  of  their  teachers  through  the  program  each  year.  Liberty-Eylau
ISD  followed  quickly  with  up  to  five  scholarships  per  year.  The  two  districts
also pay for the students’ textbooks.
• The  Young  Writers’  Program,  a  program  that  has  offered  thousands  of  area
students the opportunity to participate in a two-week, half-day writing activity
each summer. Approximately 150 students in grades two through twelve who
are  recommended  by  their  classroom  teachers  and  selected  by  a  university

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

33

committee  participate  each  year.  Program  goals  are:  (1)  to  identify  students
who  show  potential  in  writing  and  encourage  them  to  excel  as  writers,  (2)  to
create a community of writers and offer students the chance to work with pro-
fessional  authors,  (3)  to  provide  students  with  the  opportunity  to  meet  stu-
dents from other schools who are interested in writing, and (4) to provide stu-
dents with the opportunity to get their work published. Students have the op-
portunity to write in various genres, including fiction, nonfiction, and poetry.
On  the  final  day  of  the  program,  parents  and  other  guests  attend  a  program
featuring some of the works written over the two-week period. Approximately
300  people  usually  attend.  An  anthology  of  the  students’  work  is  then  pre-
pared,  printed,  and  distributed  to  students  during  the  following  school  year.
• Region  VIII  Education  Service  Center  partnership  in  which  A&M–Texarkana
faculty  work  collaboratively  with  ESC  personnel  to  train  and  certify  elemen-
tary bilingual teachers for area schools: In the past five to six years, the per-
centage of limited English proficient (LEP) students in the Mt. Pleasant area
has grown significantly, and the need for bilingual teachers has grown accord-
ingly.  To  address  this  need,  A&M–Texarkana  faculty  developed  and  imple-
mented  a  EC–4  Generalist  with  Bilingual  Education  certification  program.
Faculty  offer  course  work  to  students  via  face-to-face  and  distance  education
formats.  Participants  spend  from  two  to  four  weeks  at  a  partner  institution
in Mexico each May refining their Spanish language skills.

For  the  past  ten  years,  the  Texarkana  ISD  has  been  A&M–Texarkana’s  major
public school partner. Consequently, when the Texarkana ISD Board of Trustees ap-
proved the Martha and Josh Morriss Elementary School for Mathematics and Engi-
neering in 2004, the university faculty and administration made an immediate com-
mitment  to  assist  the  district  with  this  formidable  project.  The  three  main  cat-
egories  of  collaboration  were  facility  planning,  integrated  curriculum  development,
and teacher training.

• Facility  planning:  A&M–Texarkana  engineering  faculty  worked  with  Tex-
arkana  ISD  administrators  and  their  architects  in  the  conceptual  design  of
the building, providing consultation regarding the size, proximity, and utiliza-
tion of space, as well as the inclusion of engineering and mathematics ‘‘value
added’’ elements.
• Integrated  curriculum  development:  Faculty  and  administration  within  the
College  of  Arts  &  Sciences  and  Education  worked  collaboratively  with  rep-
resentatives from the Texarkana ISD curriculum department to envision and
create  a  framework  for  the  new  school’s  grade  K–5  curriculum.  After  much
research  and  discussion,  the  team  determined  that  the  Texas  curriculum
standards  (Texas  Essential  Knowledge  and  Skills)  would  serve  as  the  core
curriculum,  augmented  by  discrete  engineering  courses  at  each  grade  level,
and delivered via an integrated approach in which engineering and/or mathe-
matics  concepts  would  be  threaded  through  all  subjects.  Delivery  of  the  cur-
riculum would be student-centered and project-based, with assessment of stu-
dent learning relying heavily upon authentic performance measures.
• Teacher  training:  After  the  integrated  curriculum  was  outlined,  Texarkana
ISD curriculum specialists and A&M–Texarkana faculty developed syllabi for
two  A&M–Texarkana  graduate  courses  that  would  be  taken  by  all  Morriss
teachers  during  the  summer  prior  to  the  opening  of  the  new  school.  One
course  addressed  the  design  (content)  of  the  curriculum;  the  other  addressed
the  delivery  (instructional  strategies)  of  the  integrated  curriculum.  Both
courses were taught by Texarkana ISD curriculum specialists who were given
adjunct  faculty  status  at  the  university.  Morriss  teachers  received  credit  for
both  courses  toward  their  Master  of  Science  degrees  in  curriculum  and  in-
struction.  All  Morriss  teachers  who  do  not  already  have  a  Master’s  degree  at
the time of assignment to the school are required to obtain the degree, as well
as the Texas Master Mathematics Teacher (MMT) certification, a 12-semester
credit hour program developed by A&M–Texarkana faculty.

In addition to being a partner in the Martha and Josh Morriss Elementary School
for  Mathematics  and  Engineering,  A&M–Texarkana  is  involved  in  other  STEM  ac-
tivities:

• East  Texas  Regional  Collaborative  for  Excellence  in  Science  Teaching  (http:/
/www.tamut.edu/-allard/etrc/etrcindex.htm):  This  program  involves  A&M–
Texarkana,  Texarkana  College,  and  pre-K–12  public  school  teachers  in  the
Northeast Texas geographical area. The primary focus is on the improvement
of science teaching with respect to teacher content knowledge, pedagogy, and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

34

technology  integration  in  the  classroom.  Teachers  receive  a  minimum  of  105
hours of intensive professional development per year. Other agencies or insti-
tutions  that  have  provided  teacher  development  grants  include  the  Texas
Higher  Education  Coordinating  Board  (Teacher  Quality  grant  program);  the
Texas  Commission  on  Environmental  Quality,  the  Institute  for  Global  Envi-
ronmental Studies ESSEA program, and the NASA–NOVA program.
• Robotics  Summer  Camp  for  students  held  on  the  A&M–Texarkana  campus
each  summer:  For  the  past  three  years,  A&M–Texarkana’s  Student  Recruit-
ment Group has received funds from the Texas Workforce Commission to sup-
port the Robotics Camp, designed to encourage high school and middle school
students  to  consider  computer  8s  information  sciences  (CIS)  as  a  college
major.  Instructors  for  the  camp  are  drawn  from  A&M–Texarkana’s  CIS  pro-
fessors  and  students.  Attendees  meet  from  1  p.m.  to  5  p.m.  every  afternoon
for  two  weeks  to  learn  the  fundamentals  of  robotics,  robotics  programming,
robotics construction techniques, and robotics trouble shooting. Camp attend-
ance  has  grown  steadily  over  the  past  three  years.  In  summer  2007,  24  stu-
dents participated in the Camp. There is typically a rich mix of minority stu-
dents among the attendees. At the end of the Camp, teams of attendees par-
ticipate in a robotics competition that receives regional news coverage.
• Teachers’  Robotics  Workshop  for  pre-K–12  teachers:  A&M–Texarkana’s  com-
puter and information sciences (CIS) program has sponsored three workshops
to  demonstrate  how  robots  can  be  used  as  a  teaching  tool  in  pre-K–12  class-
rooms.  Robotics  instruction  and  demonstrations  are  provided  by  professional
robotics  instructors.  Participating  teachers  are  given  access  to  robotics  kits
throughout  the  year  to  enhance  their  knowledge  about  the  techniques  pre-
sented  in  the  workshop.  Previous  workshops  have  been  one  day  in  duration
and  each  has  attracted  approximately  12  teachers.  In  summer  2008,  the
Teachers Robotics Workshop will be expanded to two days.
• A  Saturday  Programming  Clinic  to  teach  and  refine  to  teach  and  refine  com-
puter programming language skills of the participants. A&M–Texarkana com-
puter  and  information  sciences  faculty  initiated  and  operate  the  clinic  meets
on A&M–Texarkana’s campus each Saturday from 10 a.m. to 2 p.m. To date,
the clinic has served community college students and members of the general
public  totaling  approximately  25  participants.  Next  year,  the  clinic  plans  to
actively recruit high school students.
• A ‘‘think tank’’ collaborative to develop replicable models that can aggressively
improve  the  success  of  public  school  children  in  all  aspect  of  STEM:  For  the
past  two  years,  select  members  of  the  A&M–Texarkana  faculty,  the  Tex-
arkana  ISD  leadership  and  curriculum  staff,  and  City  of  Texarkana  leader-
ship  have  collaborated  with  faculty  from  UT–Dallas,  Baylor  University,
Princeton University, and Texas State Technical Institute in the analysis and
selection  of  next  step  initiatives  to  further  the  STEM  agenda,  utilizing  the
Texarkana collaboration as a laboratory model.
• National  Science  Foundation  (NSF)  Robert  Noyce  Scholarship  Program:  Al-
most  four  years  ago,  A&M–Texarkana  was  one  of  17  universities  awarded  a
first  time  Robert  Noyce  Scholarship  Program  funded  by  the  National  Science
Foundation  in  the  amount  of  $389,850  for  four  years.  The  purpose  of  the
Noyce  Program  is  to  provide  scholarship  assistance  to  talented  junior  and
senior  mathematics  and  science  undergraduate  majors  who  demonstrate  fi-
nancial  need  and  who  desire  to  earn  their  teacher  certification  through  the
Bachelor’s  degree.  STEM  professionals,  who  have  a  mathematics  or  science
degree  and  have  been  working  in  their  field,  may  choose  to  enter  A&M–
Texarkana’s  Alternative  Certification  Program  (ACP)  to  earn  their  teaching
credentials  and  receive  stipends  through  the  Noyce  Program.  Recruitment  is
specifically  aimed  at  under-represented  racial  minority  and  female  students.
The  Noyce  Program  has  awarded  28  scholarships  to  date.  Twenty-nine  (29)
percent  of  the  recipients  are  science  majors  and  71  percent  are  mathematics
majors. Seventeen (17) undergraduate students have graduated and are fully
certified mathematics or science teachers while four STEM professionals have
received their teaching credentials for mathematics or science. Two additional
students  will  complete  resident  teaching  in  May  and  will  graduate  in  spring
2008, bringing the total number of graduates to 23. The most effective compo-
nent of this program is the scholarship awards.

All  of  the  initiatives  described  above,  as  well  as  those  underway  in  other
collaboratives  across  the  Nation,  are  certainly  worthy  efforts  in  attempting  to  ad-
dress the important mission so eloquently stated in the title of this hearing—Shap-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

35

ing  Our  Future  Science,  Technology,  Engineering  and  Mathematics  Leaders  of  To-
morrow  By  Inspiring  Our  Children  of  Today.  However,  much  more  is  needed. . ..
Although  the  United  States  may  be  a  world  economic  and  political  power  in  many
aspects,  data  support  a  widely  held  concern  that  our  students  are  not  leading  the
way  in  science,  technology,  mathematics  and  engineering.  I  propose  that  this  lack
of  achievement  is  primarily  a  function  of  what  happens  in  schools,  not  limitations
inherent within the students. Research supports the proposition that students from
all  demographic  groups  learn  at  higher  rates  when  the  curriculum  objectives  are
clear  and  measurable,  effective  teaching  methods  are  utilized,  and  formative  and
summative  assessment  data  are  routinely  translated  into  feedback  for  instructional
improvement.  A  final  requirement  is  that  all  major  stakeholders  have  and  commu-
nicate  high  expectations  that  all  students  can  learn  the  objectives  at  a  high  degree
of mastery.

In the areas of mathematics and science, achieving this lofty goal involves the de-
livery  of  a  rigorous  curriculum  in  the  primary  grades  via  pedagogy  that  initiates
and  sustains  the  engagement,  curiosity,  and  excitement  of  children—i.e.,  student-
centered  activities;  meaningful,  real-world  applications;  discovery  learning;  and
challenging projects. It is critical that students develop a strong sense of confidence
in their ability to ‘‘do’’ mathematics and science at an early age. This self-confidence
promotes the further pursuit of rigorous course work in the middle and high school
years that forms the foundation for a strong internal locus of control regarding their
ability  to  choose  and  experience  success  in  challenging  careers  in  mathematics  or
science.  Reversing  a  student’s  negative  attitude  toward  and  failure  to  thrive  in
science  or  mathematics  that  has  developed  in  elementary  school  is  extremely  dif-
ficult  to  accomplish  during  the  middle  years  and  almost  impossible  by  the  time  a
student arrives on the high school campus.

Elementary  teachers  charged  with  this  incredibly  challenging  but  important  task
of hooking children to mathematics and science in the elementary years are, for the
most part, doing their best, considering their limited formal training. Many teachers
lack  the  content  knowledge  themselves  and  the  pedagogy  skills  to  make  mathe-
matics and science come alive for students and, therefore, to promote high levels of
student curriculum mastery. A review of elementary teachers’ college transcripts as
well  as  university  teacher  certification  plans  typically  reveals  few  mathematics/
mathematic education and science/science education courses. Further, many elemen-
tary teachers self report a lack of interest, preparation, or confidence in their ability
to teach mathematics or science.

The  first  step  to  improved  student  achievement  in  mathematics  and  science  is
building  the  capacity  of  teachers  by  increasing  their  content  knowledge  and  broad-
ening  their  skill  sets  in  delivering  a  rigorous,  but  compelling  and  engaging  cur-
riculum.  Although  important  at  all  grade  levels,  an  urgency  must  be  placed  at  the
elementary  level  because  of  the  greater  teacher  need,  exacerbated  by  the  criticality
of  making  the  student  mathematics  and  science  ‘‘connection’’  in  the  early,  impres-
sionable years. The solution to accomplishing this goal involves several approaches,
ideally implemented simultaneously:

a. Redefine  teacher  education  to  require  additional  science  and  mathematics

content and pedagogy course work;

b. Strengthen  the  knowledge  and  skills  of  existing  teachers  through  profes-
sional  development  via  summer  institutes,  specific  topic  seminars,  graduate
degree  and  certificate  programs  (such  as  the  MMT),  and  professional  learn-
ing communities;

c. Refine  and  expand  the  knowledge  base  of  ‘‘what  works’’  in  mathematics  and
science  education  through  applied  and  action  research.  Disseminate  the  re-
sults far and wide;

d. Increase the number of mathematics and science teachers by awarding four-
year  comprehensive  scholarships  to  highly  ranked  teacher  education  institu-
tions;

e. Require  an  aligned  delivery  system  at  the  high  school  and  university  level
that  has  a  proven  high  probability  of  producing  teachers  prepared  to  teach
the advanced academic courses necessary for students to compete in a world
economy.  Random  delivery  of  a  non-aligned  curriculum  at  university  level
will  continue  to  produce  teachers  that  are  often  ill  prepared  to  deliver  the
richness  of  advanced  mathematics,  science,  and  engineering  curriculum  to
our youth.

The  Federal  Government  can  certainly  help  to  actualize  these  efforts  by  estab-
lishing expectations and continuing to offer competitive funding opportunities to in-
crease the effectiveness (knowledge and skills) of new and existing teachers.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

36

If  we  are  to  attract,  educate,  and  retain  the  critical  mass  of  talent  necessary  to
keep the State of Texas and the country as a whole at the forefront of research, de-
velopment  and  ground-breaking  advances  in  science  and  technology,  we  must  take
decisive steps toward that end. In addition to those already cited, the following ini-
tiatives should be considered:

a. Increase  the  number  of  doctoral/post-doctoral  fellowships  to  promote  in-
creased  numbers  of  terminal  degree  prepared  university  faculty  to  support
larger  and/or  additional  university  undergraduate  and  Master’s  level  pro-
grams,  increasing  the  probability  that  all  students  who  meet  entrance  re-
quirements and have the desire to pursue a degree in science, mathematics,
technology, and/or engineering can do so;

b. Increase  the  number  and  dollar  amount  of  funded  research  grants  and  un-
dergraduate,  as  well  as  graduate  university  scholarships  in  critical  mathe-
matics, engineering, and science fields;

c. Develop  and  implement  strong  information,  advising,  and  marketing  pro-
grams  for  science,  mathematics,  technology,  and  engineering  careers  in  mid-
dle and high schools, targeting females and racial minority students; and

d. Enlarge the pipeline of students who are prepared to enter college and grad-
uate with a degree in science, mathematics by increasing the number of stu-
dents  who  pass  Advanced  Placement  (AP)  and  International  Baccalaureate
(IB) science and mathematics courses.

From the National Academies of Science and Engineering:

a. Provide a federal tax credit to encourage employers to make continuing edu-

cation available to practicing scientists and engineers;

b. Improve  the  visa  processing  for  international  students  and  scholars  (Com-
plying  with  the  18-month  limit  regarding  labor  certification  is  difficult  in
higher education); and

c. Provide a one-year automatic visa extension to international students who re-
ceive  doctorates  in  science,  engineering,  technology,  and  mathematics  to  re-
main in the United States to seek employment.

The  need  for  a  working  understanding  of  mathematics,  science,  and  technology
goes well beyond applying it in a career and shoring-up the workforce. Such knowl-
edge  and  skills  actually  serve  as  tools  for  increasing  productivity  and  enjoyment  in
everyday  life,  including  but  not  limited  to  managing/operating  a  residence,  partici-
pating in leisure activities and hobbies, traveling, volunteering, and maximizing en-
tertainment options. Further, as the environment in which we live becomes increas-
ingly complex as a result of a variety of human-induced conditions and natural phe-
nomena,  increased  knowledge  in,  and  application  of,  science,  mathematics,  and/or
technology  will  be  necessary  for  citizens  to  understand  and  respond  quickly  to
changes  that  can  significantly  affect  their  short-term  and  long-range  quality  of  life.
Providing sufficient opportunities that allow students, researchers, educators, and
employees  to  become  and  then  remain  current  and  competitive  in  science,  mathe-
matics,  and  technology  is  critical  to  living,  working,  and  prospering  in  a  rapidly
evolving  world.  The  first  step  to  achieving  this  goal  is  to  heighten  stakeholder
awareness  of  the  importance  and  benefits  of  becoming  and  remaining  current  and
competitive,  followed  closely  by  establishing  reasonable  but  high  expectations  and
measures  of  accountability;  offering  incentives  (i.e.,  recognition;  financial  rewards
and/or  other  benefits)  as  well  as  opportunities  for  career  advancement;  and  pro-
viding  access  to  free  and  reasonably  priced  quality  training  and  professional  devel-
opment.

In  closing,  I  believe  that  what  we  have  seen  here  today  at  the  Martha  and  Josh
Morriss  Elementary  School  for  Mathematics  and  Engineering  is  the  result  of  open,
collaborative  efforts  between  and  among  a  community  willing  to  seek  excellence,  a
university  whose  leadership  embraced  the  wishes  of  the  community,  and  a  public
school  that  was  willing  to  take  a  risk  to  do  what  was  needed  as  opposed  to  what
has  always  been  done.  There  is  nothing  profound  or  complex  in  this  replicable
model.  It  is  the  result  of  an  integration  of  vision,  tenacity,  and  the  courage  to  do
what is required to offer our children the chance to compete and lead in tomorrow’s
world.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

STATEMENT OF MR. MIKE LEHERR, PLANT MANAGER, ALCOA–

TEXARKANA, TEXARKANA, TEXAS

37

Mr.  LEHERR.  I’m  privileged  to  be  here,  Chairman  Gordon,  Rank-
ing  Member  Congressman  Hall,  Congressman  Ross  and  Members
of  the  Committee.  I  appreciate  this  opportunity  to  present  testi-
mony. I’m Mike Leherr, Plant Manager of Alcoa Texarkana. Alcoa–
Texarkana  is  a  manufacturer  of  aluminum  sheet.  It’s  about  a  mil-
lion  square  feet  of  highly  sophisticated  equipment,  with  350  em-
ployees. Alcoa produces aluminum for applications such as commer-
cial trucks, trailers, boats, appliances, and general industrial appli-
cations.  We  supply  customers  throughout  North  America.  Our
workforce is made up of engineers, technicians, chemists, computer
scientists, accountants, operators, and maintenance crafts. Approxi-
mately  fifty  percent  of  our  salary  workforce  has  professional  tech-
nical  degrees  in  the  disciplines  of  science,  technology,  engineering
and  math.  Additionally,  many  of  our  purchased  services  and  prod-
ucts require technical training as well.

As a business leader, I am responsible for insuring Alcoa remains
competitive in today’s rural environment. In fact, Alcoa–Texarkana
directly  competes  all  over  the  world.  We  are  facing  increased  com-
petition from foreign manufacturers with significantly lower wages.
In  order  to  remain  competitive  now  and  into  the  future,  the  work-
force at Alcoa must continue to find ways to apply new knowledge,
develop new technologies, and implement next generation manufac-
turing  practices.  The  foundation  starts  with  strong  STEM  edu-
cation.

Alcoa–Texarkana  as  well  as  other  manufacturers  in  the  area
have  increasingly  found  it  more  difficult  to  find  and  recruit  highly
skilled people with strong backgrounds in science, engineering and
math.

We  find  ourselves  casting  a  wider  and  wider  net  to  find  highly
skilled  recruits.  Additionally,  we  are  seeing  an  increasing  number
of  requests  for  non-U.S.  citizens  with  each  professional  posting.  In
fact,  in  our  last  engineering  position,  34  percent  of  the  applicants
were educated outside of the United States. Twenty-five percent of
the  applicants  were  requesting  visa  sponsorship.  Zero  percent  of
the applicants were local.

It  is  evident  that  the  local  and  national  availability  of  highly
skilled  people  is  getting  smaller.  A  strong  STEM  competency  goes
beyond  recruiting  for  technical  professions.  In  order  to  compete,
Alcoa–Texarkana  relies  on  all  our  employees  applying  statistical
methods,  problem  solving  or  re-engineering  efforts.  It’s  not  uncom-
mon for operators and maintenance craft people to redesign and re-
engineer.  Our  ability  to  succeed  now  and  compete  into  the  future
greatly  depends  on  our  ability  to  recruit  people  with  strong  STEM
knowledge.

Alcoa–Texarkana  plays  a  key  role  in  the  community  through  its
direct  and  indirect  economic  impact,  Alcoa  Foundation  grants,  and
volunteer  activities  through  our  ‘‘Neighbors  Committee.’’  Commu-
nities  matter  to  Alcoa.  Our  future  is  linked  to  the  future  of  our
community. Our future is also linked to the availability of a skilled
workforce.  It’s  because  we  understand  this  link  that  we  support
STEM education efforts.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

38

Alcoa–Texarkana has played a role in educational quality encour-
aging  young  people  to  study  math  and  science.  These  efforts  in-
clude:
At  the  university  level,  Alcoa  was  one  of  the  first  companies  to  invest  in  the  cam-
paign  to  bring  the  College  of  Engineering  and  Computer  Information  Sciences  to
A&M–Texarkana. Alcoa Foundation grants to develop a Bachelor of Science Degree
program and purchase equipment for the College.
At the high school level, Alcoa engineers participate in ‘‘Learning
for  Life’’  programs  where  engineers  discuss  science  and  technology
careers  with  eighth  and  ninth  graders.  Additionally,  Alcoa  engi-
neers lead ‘‘Adopt a Class’’ through Junior Achievement.

At the elementary level, Alcoa gave Foundation grants to support
the  math  in  the  Magnet  School  of  Arkansas  with  the  purchase  of
interactive white boards. We also provided a grant for Morriss Ele-
mentary  School  for  the  purchase  and  use  of  high  powered  tele-
scopes.  It  is  our  belief  that  the  use  of  such  equipment  will  help
young  children  get  enthused  about  math  and  science  by  seeing  it
in use.

I,  as  well  as  many  here,  want  to  see  Alcoa–Texarkana  be  here
for a long time. I also want to see other businesses in this commu-
nity  prosper  into  the  future,  giving  students  the  tools  and  passion
to  learn  more  about  science  technology,  engineering  and  math,
which are an essential piece for making that happen.

Increasing STEM education is critical for the ability of all Ameri-
cans  to  compete.  I  applaud  the  leadership  of  Texarkana  Inde-
pendent  School  District,  A&M–Texarkana  and  the  community  for
acting  and  bringing  STEM  education  to  Texarkana.  I  also  applaud
this  committee  for  its  efforts  in  enhancing  American  competitive-
ness  and  the  actions  it’s  taking  to  insure  high-quality  life  for  our
children and grandchildren. Thank you.

Mr. HALL. I thank you, sir.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Leherr follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF MIKE LEHERR

It’s  a  privilege  to  be  here  Chairman  Gordon  and  Ranking  Member  Congressman
Hall  and  all  the  Members  of  the  Committee  for  this  opportunity  to  present  testi-
mony on the importance of enhancing Science, Technology, Engineering and Mathe-
matics education.

I  am  Mike  Leherr,  Plant  Manager  of  Alcoa–Texarkana  Works.  Alcoa–Texarkana
is  a  manufacturer  of  aluminum  sheet.  With  highly  sophisticated  mills  and  equip-
ment,  we  convert  predominately  scrap  aluminum  into  a  finished  rolled  product  for
use in commercial trucks, trailers, boats, appliances, automotive, and general indus-
trial  applications.  We  supply  customers  throughout  North  America.  Our  workforce
is  made  up  of  Engineers,  Technicians,  Chemists,  and  Computer  Science  profes-
sionals,  Accountants,  Operators  and  Maintenance  crafts.  Approximately  50  percent
of  our  salary  workforce  has  professional  technical  degrees  in  the  disciplines  of
Science,  Technology,  Engineering  or  Math.  Additionally,  many  of  our  purchased
services and products require technical training and qualifications as well.

As  a  business  leader,  I  am  responsible  for  ensuring  that  Alcoa–Texarkana  re-
mains  competitive  in  today’s  global  environment;  in  fact,  Alcoa–Texarkana  directly
competes with manufacturing facilities all over the world for our business. In order
to remain competitive, now and into the future, the Alcoa–Texarkana workforce, as
well  as  other  businesses,  must  continue  to  find  ways  to  apply  new  knowledge,  de-
velop  new  technologies,  and  implement  next  generation  manufacturing  practices.
The  foundation  of  this  future  must  start  with  strong  STEM  education.  Technology
change and globalization have driven the need for higher order skill sets for today’s
and tomorrow’s businesses.

Alcoa–Texarkana,  as  well  as  other  manufacturers  in  the  area,  has  increasingly
found  it  more  difficult  to  find  and  recruit  highly  skilled  people  with  strong  back-
ground  in  Sciences,  Engineering,  and  Math.  We  find  ourselves  casting  a  wider  and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

39

wider  net  to  find  highly  skilled  recruits.  We  also  are  seeing  an  increasing  number
of  requests  to  sponsor  visas  for  non-U.S.  citizens  with  each  professional  posting.  It
is evident that the local and national availability of highly skilled people with is get-
ting smaller.

A strong STEM competency is not only needed for our technical professionals but
also our Operators and Maintenance crafts people. Alcoa–Texarkana continues to in-
crease  engagement  of  employees  and  rely  on  all  our  employees  applying  statistical
methods,  problem  solving,  re-engineering  efforts.  It  is  not  uncommon  for  Operators
and Maintenance crafts people to re-design equipment and processes. Our ability to
succeed and compete into the future greatly depends on our ability to recruit people
of all disciplines with strong STEM knowledge.

The  STEM  education  program  that  has  been  developed  here  at  the  Martha  and
Josh  Morriss  Mathematics  and  Engineering  Elementary  School  is  exemplary.  I  be-
lieve  this  school  will  provide  students  with  the  knowledge,  ability  and  most  impor-
tantly,  the  enthusiasm  and  desire  to  excel  in  Science,  Technology,  Engineering  and
Math.

Alcoa–Texarkana plays a key role in the community through its economic impact,
Alcoa  Foundation  grants,  and  volunteer  activities  through  our  ‘‘Neighbors  Com-
mittee.’’  Communities  matter  to  Alcoa.  Communities  hold  our  franchise  to  operate
and  we  need  their  resources,  infrastructure,  markets,  and  workforce  to  thrive.  In
turn, we owe them our integrity, careful stewardship of the environment, our ability
to  provide  jobs  and  community  support.  Our  future  is  linked  to  the  future  of  our
community.  It  is  because  we  understand  this  linkage  that  we  support  STEM  edu-
cation efforts. Alcoa–Texarkana has played a role in educational quality and encour-
aging  young  people  to  study  math  and  sciences.  We  have  actively  supported  STEM
education at all levels. These efforts include:

• At  the  University  level,  Alcoa–Texarkana  was  one  of  the  first  companies  to
invest in the campaign to bring the College of Engineering and Computer In-
formation  Sciences  to  A&M–Texarkana.  Alcoa  Foundation  Grants  were  used
to develop a Bachelor of Science Degree program and purchase equipment for
the  College  of  Engineering  and  Computer  Information  Sciences  Program  at
Texas A&M–Texarkana.
• At the High School level Alcoa–Texarkana Engineers participate in ‘‘Learning
for  Life’’  programs  where  Engineers  discuss  science  and  technology  careers
with  8th  and  9th  grade  students.  Additionally,  Alcoa–Texarkana  Engineers
lead ‘‘Adopt a Classroom’’ through Junior Achievement.
• At  the  Elementary  level,  Alcoa–Texarkana  and  the  Alcoa  Foundation  have
given  foundation  grants  to  support  Math  and  Engineering  Magnet  School  in
Arkansas. We also provided a grant to the Morriss Elementary School for the
purchase and use of high powered telescopes. The use of such equipment will
help young children get enthused about the sciences by seeing it in use. Addi-
tionally,  Alcoa–Texarkana  has  also  been  in  discussion  with  Morriss  Elemen-
tary about a working exhibit on renewable energy.

I,  as  well  as  many  here,  want  to  see  Alcoa–Texarkana  be  here  for  a  long  time.
Giving  students  the  tools  and  passion  for  learning  more  about  science,  technology,
engineering,  and  math  will  be  a  vital  piece  into  making  that  happen.  Increasing
STEM education is critical for the ability of all Americans to compete globally.

I  applaud  the  leadership  of  Texas  Independent  School  District,  A&M–Texarkana,
and  the  community  for  acting  and  bringing  enhanced  STEM  education  to  Tex-
arkana.  I  also  applaud  this  committee  for  its  efforts  in  enhancing  STEM  education
in this country.

Thank you.

BIOGRAPHY FOR MIKE LEHERR

Mike  has  been  with  ALCOA  for  17  years.  He  began  his  professional  career  as  an
engineer  at  Alcoa’s  Warrick  Operations.  He  held  a  variety  of  manufacturing,  engi-
neering,  and  maintenance  assignments  at  Alcoa’s  Warrick  operations  until  1996
when  he  accepted  a  position  overseas  in  the  company’s  Swansea,  Wales  facility  as
Hot Mill Production and Maintenance Manager. From 1999–2005 Mike held a vari-
ety  of  progressive  Plant  Management  and  Director  of  Manufacturing  roles  in  dif-
ferent  divisions  within  ALCOA.  In  July  2006,  Mike  was  named  Plant  Manager  of
Alcoa–Texarkana Works.

Mike  graduated  from  the  University  of  Notre  Dame  with  a  Bachelor  of  Science
Degree  in  Mechanical  Engineering.  Mike  is  active  in  a  variety  of  charitable,  edu-
cational, and civic activities. Mike serves on the board of the United Way of Greater

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

40

Texarkana,  serves  as  a  member  of  the  Blue  Ribbon  Committee  for  the  Texarkana
Independent  School  District.  Mike  is  also  a  baseball  and  soccer  coach  for  youth  ac-
tivities in the area.

Mr. HALL. Now we recognize David Smedley.

STATEMENT  OF  MR.  DAVID  SMEDLEY,  SCIENCE  EDUCATOR,
NORTH  HEIGHTS  JUNIOR  HIGH  SCHOOL,  TEXARKANA,  AR-
KANSAS
Mr.  SMEDLEY.  Thank  you,  Chairman  Gordon.  Ranking  Member
Hall,  and  Congressman  Ross.  My  name  is  David  Smedley.  I  teach
seventh  and  eighth  grade  science  at  North  Heights  Junior  High
School on the Arkansas side. I am fresh out of the trenches. I was
there  this  morning.  Some  of  the  things  I  may  say,  I  hope  do  not
sound abrasive, but this is the way it is in the trenches.

The  major  problem  that  limits  our  teachers  in  the  middle  school
years  and  the  primary  years  is  the  broad-base  of  knowledge  and
partnerships of life and physical science. In addition, time demands
placed  on  teachers  during  non-school  hours  for  extracurricular  ac-
tivities  and  responsibilities  adds  stresses  and  pressures  that  have
nothing  to  do  with  aiding  the  teacher  in  presentation  of  materials.
In  the  middle  school  years  many  teachers  are  specializing  in  one
of the three areas of science, life or physical science and do not feel
comfortable  and  are  not  totally  prepared  to  present  lessons  in  the
other areas of science.

In the primary school years, most teachers are not equipped nei-
ther  academically  to,  nor  experientially  to  present  the  science  con-
tents. It’s my opinion that the single most important step that the
Federal  Government  could  take  to  improve  K–12th  grade  science
education  is  to  nationally  align  the  teaching  of  science  content  in
the  United  States.  The  situation  needs  to  be  so  that  if  a  student
moves from Colorado to Arkansas or any other state that the same
science  concepts  are  being  taught  at  approximately  the  same  time
of  year  and  to  the  same  level  of  understanding  at  the  same  grade
levels.

Advanced  classes  should  also  be  made  available.  A  nationwide
science  curriculum  could  be  posted  on  the  Internet  for  all  schools
to  use.  As  students  progress  in  the  curriculum  standardized  test
that  all  students  in  America  would  take  would  produce  data  used
to  award  scholarships  or  grants,  to  help  students  attend  colleges,
universities, vocational schools or some specialty school.

In  order  to  produce  students  that  can  compete  in  the  inter-
national stage of science a greater degree of support in the form of
resources,  training,  and  organization  needs  to  come  from  the  Fed-
eral  Government.  This  support  must  not  be  in  the  form  of  regula-
tions  and  bureaucracy,  but  must  be  pragmatically  directed  at  how
these  decisions  will  affect  the  individual  student  sitting  in  our
classrooms.

Our school is a NASA Explorer School and receives much quality
training in resources to help students prepare for the sciences. The
most  important  and  effective  components  of  these  programs  is  the
resource and support.

After  interviewing  my  students  this  week,  telling  them  that  I
was  going  to  come  to  speak  on  these  topics,  their  opinion  on  how
to  keep  them  motivated  was  to  give  them  engaging,  hands-on  ac-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

41

tivities.  They  also  said  that  inspired  teachers,  they  need  inspired
teachers, not just someone who’s presenting the material in a very
mundane way.

Students  in  today’s  classrooms  are  not  the  same  type  of  animal
they  were  even  a  few  short  years  ago.  Technology  is  a  must  in
order  for  us  to  truly  prepare  our  students  for  this  new  world  and
make them feel they are one of society’s major foci.

Many  activities  that  occur  in  my  classroom  are  student  gen-
erated.  As  we  were  studying  Newton’s  Laws  of  Motion  one  of  the
classes asked if they could construct a trade machine. I didn’t pre-
tend  to  know  what  the  students  were  asking,  but  instead  allowed
our  students  to  use  our  Promethean  Board  large  screen  in  front  of
the class and research the topic on the Internet. As the entire class
reviewed  the  research  on  the  large  screen,  greater  interest  was
generated.  To  make  the  story  short,  we  constructed  it  and  were
able  to  actually  experience  the  Laws  of  Physics  rather  than  just
read about and work the math problems related to this usually bor-
ing and technical topic.

Other  activities  that  have  been  huge  successes  in  the  middle
school  include  producing  products  such  as  solar  powered  cars,  hy-
drogen  fuel  cell  cars,  robotics,  bridge  building,  basic  and  advanced
dissections,  GPS,  global  positioning  systems  units,  plant  growth
and  CGC,  electric  motors,  electric  circuits  and  model  rocketry.  In
all  of  these  units,  direct  application  of  the  learning  can  be  pointed
out  easily.  When  the  students  are  guided  in  the  construction  of  a
natural  working  model  such  as  a  robot  they’re  excited  and  moti-
vated  to  have  achieved  success  and  can  see  some  concrete  product
as evidence.

Another  component  that  I  believe  helps  me  to  motivate  my  stu-
dents is I try to connect my sciences to the other content areas the
students  are  taking.  I  try  to  build  community  in  the  classroom.
Students  have  to  feel  comfortable.  They  have  to  know  that  their
learning is connected to another student’s learning. So, pure teach-
ing and pure learning takes place among our students as they work
cooperatively in small groups.

This builds respect for both the teacher and learner in this pure
teaching model. As the year progresses, the teacher and the learner
roles  are  experienced  by  all  in  some  manner,  and  you  don’t  know
what  you  don’t  know  until  you  try  to  teach  someone  or  explain  it
to  someone  else.  And  as  these  students  help  each  other  in  their
problem-solving process in these hands-on activities, they gain a re-
spect for themselves as well as each other.

Parents could better support our schools if they would simply not
put  down  the  public  school  system  in  general.  Parents  need  to
make  sure  their  students  have  the  simple  necessities  of  food  and
rest that young people need to learn.

Parents  can  try  to  provide  a  stable  environment  by  remaining
the primary caregiver for the child and not placing the responsibil-
ities  of  raising  the  child  on  some  aunt,  uncle,  grandparent  or  a
babysitter. The community can help if they become involved in pro-
viding learning activities outside the school building.

Businessmen and women could come speak to students and show
how  their  job  as  well  as  the  social  skills  of  these  students  need  to
learn.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

42

In  summary,  what  I  need  as  a  public  school  teacher  is  support,
resources and training, up-to-date training, and continual training.
It’s  hard  to  keep  up  with  all  these  technological  advances  and
methods  of  presentation.  Some  of  the  best  teachers  that  we  have
that  can  contact  with  the  students  the  best  are  left  behind  as  vet-
eran  teachers  with  technology.  New  teachers  are  coming  in,  but
they  don’t  have  the  experience  and  can’t  make  the  same  type  of
contact  as  the  older  teachers,  so  we  need  up  to  date  and  on-going
training. Thank you very much.

Mr.  HALL.  I  thank  you.  We  needed  you  as  a  part  of  this  panel
to  complete  the  circuit  for  the  information  that’s  needed.  You’re  at
the helm. You’re fresh there. Thirty, 45 minutes ago you were prob-
ably with your students. We thank you for coming here.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Smedley follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF DAVID SMEDLEY

1. What are the major problems that limit the performance of students and
teachers,  and  what  do  you  feel  is  the  single,  most  important  step  that
the Federal Government should take to improve K–12th grade math and
science  education?  What  involvement  have  you  had  with  math  and
science education programs at the National Science Foundation or other
federal agencies as well as those in the State of Arkansas? What are the
most important and effective components of these programs?
The  major  problem  that  limits  the  performance  of  students  in  math  and  science
is  mostly  the  attitudes  of  the  students  themselves.  Students  seem  to  think  that
learning  is  always  going  to  be  quick  and  easy.  When  the  content  is  new  or  chal-
lenging and the students find it difficult, most of the time the students simply give
up or quit. The major problem that limits the performance of the teachers in science
is  the  broad  base  of  knowledge  required  to  teach  life,  earth,  or  physical  science.  In
addition,  time  demands  placed  on  teachers  during  non-school  hours  for  extra-cur-
ricular responsibilities add stresses and pressures that have nothing to do with aid-
ing  the  teacher  in  the  presentation  of  academic  materials.  In  the  middle  school
years,  many  teachers  have  specialized  in  one  of  the  three  areas  of  science  and  do
not  feel  comfortable  and  are  not  totally  prepared  to  present  lessons  in  the  other
areas  of  science.  In  the  primary  school  years,  most  teachers  are  not  equipped  nei-
ther academically nor experientially to present the science content. State mandated
assessments  in  the  State  of  Arkansas  have  just  now,  in  the  last  three  years,  been
put  in  place  for  our  students.  This  assessment  does  not  include  any  lab  perform-
ances  to  be  done  by  the  students.  It  is  my  opinion  that  the  single,  most  important
step that the Federal Government should take to improve K–12th grade science edu-
cation  is  to  nationally  align  the  teaching  of  science  content  in  the  United  States.
The  situation  needs  to  be  so  that  if  a  student  moves  from  Colorado  to  Arkansas  or
any  other  state  that  the  same  science  concepts  are  being  taught  at  approximately
the same time of the year and to the same level of understanding at the same grade
levels.  A  nationwide  science  curriculum  could  be  posted  on  the  Internet  for  all
schools to use. As students progress through the curriculum, standardized tests that
all  students  in  America  would  take  could  produce  data  which  then  could  be  used
to award scholarships or grants to help students attend colleges, universities, voca-
tional  schools,  or  some  specialty  school.  In  order  to  produce  students  that  can  com-
pete  in  the  international  stage  of  science,  a  greater  degree  of  support  in  the  form
of  resources,  training,  and  organization  must  come  from  the  Federal  Government.
This  support  must  not  be  in  the  form  of  regulations  and  bureaucracy,  but  must  be
pragmatically  directed  at  how  these  decisions  will  affect  the  individual  student  sit-
ting  in  our  classrooms.  My  experiences  with  the  National  Science  Foundation  are
very  limited.  Associations  with  our  local  educational  coop,  the  Arkansas  State
Science  Teachers  Association,  and  the  National  Science  Teachers  Association  pro-
vide our teachers with opportunities for training and limited resources to aid in the
teaching  of  science  content.  Our  school  is  a  NASA  Explorer  School  and  receives
much  quality  training  and  resources  to  help  present  science  to  the  students.  The
most important and effective components of these programs is the resource support.
2. How  can  we  spark  a  greater  student  interest  in  math  and  science  edu-
cation?  What  can  we  do  to  ensure  that  student  interest  in  math  and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

43

science  does  not  wane  as  they  progress  through  our  formal  system  of
education? Specifically, how do you keep your junior high students mo-
tivated and excited about STEM?
After  interviewing  my  students  this  year  concerning  this  question,  I  found  that
their  opinion  on  how  to  motivate  students  in  the  sciences  and  keep  their  interest
points  to  the  fact  that  providing  engaging  activities  is  the  key.  Students  in  today’s
classrooms  are  not  the  same  type  of  animal  they  were  even  a  few  short  ten  years
ago. Technology is a must in the classroom in order for us to truly prepare our stu-
dents  for  this  new  world  and  make  them  feel  that  they  are  one  of  society’s  major
foci. Our society places its money where the priorities lie and our schools are being
cut  short.  Teachers  that  are  inspired  about  their  content  was  also  mentioned  as  a
factor  in  motivating  the  students  themselves.  It  is  my  opinion  that  teachers  must
be ready to ‘‘perform’’ for the students.

My  personal  experiences  in  teaching  have  shown  me  that  if  students  can  see  a
direct  link  between  what  they  are  studying  and  some  real-life  situation,  then  they
have more motivation to learn. Guest speakers, field trips, and special presentations
by other professionals in their field tend to increase the level of interest in students
at  all  grade  levels.  I  keep  my  junior  high  students  motivated  and  excited  about
STEM  by  showing  the  connections  between  what  I  ask  them  to  do  and  what  they
are  going  to  need  to  be  able  to  do  when  they  enter  the  job  market  and  adulthood.
Many  activities  that  occur  in  my  classroom  are  student  generated.  As  we  were
studying  Newton’s  Laws  of  Motion,  one  of  the  classes  asked  if  they  could  construct
a  trebuchet.  I  didn’t  pretend  to  know  what  the  students  were  asking,  but  instead
allowed a student to use the Promethean Board and research the topic on the Inter-
net. As the entire class viewed the research on the large screen, greater interest was
generated.  To  make  the  story  short,  we  constructed  our  trebuchet  and  were  able  to
actually  experience  the  laws  of  physics  rather  than  just  read  about  and  work  the
math  problems  related  to  this  usually  boring  and  technical  topic.  I  try  to  bring  the
teaching to life in my classroom. Other activities that have been huge successes are:
solar  powered  electric  cars,  passive  solar  ovens,  robotics,  bridge  building,  basic  and
advanced  dissections,  GPS  (global  positions  systems)  Unit,  plant  growth  from  seed
to  seed,  electric  motors,  electric  circuits,  and  model  rocketry.  In  all  of  these  units,
direct  application  of  the  learning  is  pointed  out.  When  the  students  are  guided  in
the  construction  of  an  actual  working  model  such  as  a  robot,  they  are  excited  and
motivated to have achieved success and can see some concrete product as evidence.
In  these  activities,  students  are  required  to  measure,  read  and  comprehend,  and
move through the problem solving process in order to succeed. This is another com-
ponent  that  I  believe  helps  me  to  motivate  my  students.  That  is,  I  try  to  connect
the  sciences  to  the  other  subjects  the  students  are  taking.  Completing  a  reading
comprehension activity with the use of science content and calculating a percentage
grade  requires  the  students  to  engage  their  literacy  and  math  skills  in  daily  class
activities.  At  the  beginning  of  the  school  year  and  various  points  throughout  the
year, I try to build community in the classroom. The students must be made to feel
comfortable  in  the  classroom  in  order  to  learn.  The  students  must  feel  that  both
their  learning  and  the  learning  by  others  in  the  classroom  are  connected.  Peer
teaching  and  learning  takes  place  among  the  students  as  they  work  cooperatively
in  small  groups  during  many  of  the  learning  activities.  This  builds  respect  for  both
the  teacher  and  the  learner.  As  the  year  progresses,  the  teacher  and  the  learner
roles  are  experienced  by  all  in  some  manner.  In  summary,  I  keep  my  students  ex-
cited and motivated about STEM by being real and understanding with the students
on  a  personal  level  and  by  being  challenging  and  inspiring  on  a  professional  level.
3. What challenges do you face in improving student achievement in math
and  science  education?  How  can  parents,  businesses,  the  community,
and  the  government  better  support  you  in  your  efforts  to  raise  student
proficiency in STEM?
The  challenges  faced  by  teachers  in  improving  student  achievement  in  math  and
science  education  are  multi-faceted.  Concerning  the  assessment  tool  that  indicates
the level of achievement in the State of Arkansas, I feel that the data obtained from
this  exam  is  totally  unreliable.  It  a  basic  learning  principle  that  states  in  order  to
learn the learner must be ready to learn and see the need to learn. We are assum-
ing  that  students  will  perform  their  best  when  given  the  opportunity  just  because
of  their  own  intrinsic  values.  Students  need  to  be  given  a  reason  to  pass  this  test.
Retention at grade level or remediation before passing to the next grade level might
possibly  work.  It  is  very  assuming  and  in  my  opinion  a  very  false  assumption  for
us  to  think  that  young  people  will  perform  at  a  high  level  of  achievement  without
a reason other than it is what they ‘‘should’’ do! Our schools are being held account-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

44

able to a high degree relative to the test scores of the students, but we are not plac-
ing  any  accountability  on  the  students.  Challenges  of  the  mind-set  of  the  student
when  they  arrive  at  school  from  a  family  setting  that  may  not  be  a  peaceful  or  a
healthy  environment  also  require  attention  and  understanding  from  the  teacher  as
it presents its own set of challenges.

Parents  could  better  support  the  schools  if  they  would  simply  not  put  down  the
public  school  system  in  general.  Parents  need  to  make  sure  that  students  have  the
simple necessities of food and rest that young people need to be ready to learn. Par-
ents could try to provide a stable environment by remaining the primary care-giver
for  the  child  and  not  placing  the  responsibilities  of  raising  the  child  on  some  aunt,
uncle, grandparent, or baby sitter. The community could help if they would become
involved  in  providing  learning  opportunities  outside  the  school  building.  Business
men  and  women  could  come  and  speak  to  the  students  about  how  what  they  are
learning in the classroom will be applied in the job market. These individuals could
also make the students aware of the social skills and behaviors that will be required
to  become  a  successful  employee  in  their  chosen  field.  As  stated  earlier,  I  feel  that
the  government  needs  to  step  in  and  provide  positive  leadership  and  assistance  for
the states through finances, training, and academic alignment of the sciences in our
public schools.
4. What elements of your pre-service or in-service training have been most
helpful  in  meeting  the  daily  demands  of  working  with  students,  devel-
oping  innovative  classroom  strategies,  and  delivering  content-rich  in-
struction  to  students  of  all  levels  and  abilities?  As  a  professional  teach-
er,  what  partnerships  or  collaborations  with  local  colleges  or  univer-
sities  have  been  most  helpful  to  you  in  terms  of  access  to  materials  or
professional development?
One of the important elements of my in-service training that has been most help-
ful  in  meeting  the  daily  demands  of  working  with  students  has  been  the  National
Science  Teacher  Conventions  that  I  was  able  to  attend.  This  gathering  of  science
educators  from  all  levels  of  education  has  provided  me  with  many,  many  tools  in
my  box.  I  have  been  able  to  use  methods  and  techniques  of  presentation  that  were
presented during these conventions. I have made connections and created a support
network from teachers all over the United States. Stimulating activities and projects
that  I  have  modified  have  proven  very  successful  for  my  students.  These  ideas  and
innovations  were  all  initiated  from  meeting  with  other  professionals  in  these  work-
shops as well as informally in the down time of the conventions.

In-service trainings that keep veteran teachers up on the latest technologies that
are  available  for  the  classroom  have  been  most  valuable.  As  technology  has  pro-
gressed  over  the  last  ten  to  twenty  years,  some  teachers  have  been  overwhelmed
by  new  methods  of  using  the  technology  to  present  content.  It  is  vital  that  science
teachers at all levels keep up to date on current technologies and information. This
is  also  something  that  the  government  could  help  to  provide  as  they  ensure  that
good,  quality  in-service  workshops  are  available  for  all  teachers  at  the  appropriate
grade  levels.  At  this  time,  we  do  not  have  any  partnerships  with  the  local  colleges
and universities to help with access to materials or professional development.

Education:

BIOGRAPHY FOR DAVID SMEDLEY

– High School Diploma—Arkadelphia, AR—1973
– Honorable Discharge—United States Marine Corp—1975–79
– BSE—Henderson State University—1981
– MSE—Henderson State University–1989
– Areas of Certification—Arkansas

Biology/General Sciences, Health, Physical Education, Coaching

– Certified by the College Board for Middle School Science
– Certified by International Baccalaureate Program—Middle Years Program
– Arkansas Leadership Academy trained

Career-Related Experience

– Science  Instructor—Life  Science,  Earth  Science,  Physical  Science,  Biology—

Delight High School—1981–90

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

45

– Head  Baseball  Coach,  Asst.  Basketball  Coach—Delight  High  School—1981–

90

– Health Instructor—12th Grade—Delight High School—1981–90
– Anatomy & Physiology—organized and implemented this new curriculum into
Delight  High  School  as  standards  created  the  need  for  new  science  content
Offerings—1986–90

– Science  Instructor—8th  Grade—North  Heights  Jr.  High  School—Life-Earth-

Physical—1995–2000

– Science  Instructor—Earth  Science—North  Heights  Jr.  High  School—2000–05
– Science Instructor—Life Science—North Heights Jr. High School—2000–05
– Science  Department  Chairperson—North  Heights  Jr.  High  School—1997–

2005

– Science  Instructor—North  Heights  Jr.  High  School—International  Bacca-

laureate/Advanced Placement Program—2005–08
Integrated curriculum—Life, Earth, and Physical Science

Other Work Experience:

– Arkansas  Mentor  Program  for  novice  teachers  training  for  the  Praxis  III  As-

sessment

– Team manager for Destination Imagination teams at the State level
– Co-Chair for the North Heights Leadership Team
– Creator and sponsor for the North Heights Chess Team

Grants and Awards:

– University of Wisconsin—Orbital Space Laboratory—(2000–05) $2,500
– Teacher Take Wing Grant (2000–2002–2007) $1,500
– American Power Company (2005 and 2008) $1,000
– KTBS One Class at a Time Grant (2003 and 2008) $2,000
– Weyerhaeuser Environmental Grant (2005–2006–2007) $1,500
– Texarkana Arkansas Education Foundation Grant (2004 and 2008) $2,500
– North Heights Jr. High School Teacher of the Year—(2003 and 2008)
– Recruited  $1000  in  funds  from  local  businessmen  to  support  the  chess  team
Mr.  HALL.  I’ve  recognized  the  Mayor  and  former  Mayor.  Were
there  other  public  officials?  I  thought  I  saw  Judge  Carlow  come  in
here  a  while  ago.  Judge,  are  you  here?  Stand  up  and  let  us  recog-
nize you.

He works day and night. I don’t know what he does for the coun-
ty here, but I know that he works for people in this county because
he’s working now to get some of the Red River land. The Secretary
of  the  Army  is  going  to  grant  it  to  somebody.  He’s  got  a  group
that’s  pushing  hard  to  get  it.  They  pushed  right  up  to  the  brink
several times and almost had it, and they’re still pushing.

One  other  thing,  as  Mike  Ross  knows,  there  was  a  provision  a
year  and  a  half  ago,  in  the  energy  bill  to  encourage  every  state  to
build  a  refinery.  Refinery  is  one  of  the  major  reasons  our  gasoline
is going up to four and five, six, seven, eight, maybe ten bucks be-
fore it’s all over if we don’t do something about it. It had some ben-
efits for each state and encouragement for each state to build a re-
finery. We’re trying to be the one to build that refinery right here.
The judge is giving us good leadership in that.

As a matter of fact, somebody pushed him around a little bit and
told him well, you don’t have access to ocean travel. He said yeah,
we don’t have any hurricanes either. Pretty dog-gone good answer.
Pretty tough guy. Are there other public officials here? Thank you.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

46

We have Mr—now we get to ask some questions for five minutes
here, and y’all can put the clock on us. We thank you for your testi-
mony. It was well given. We’re grateful for it.

We  have—Tom  Pickens  is  one  of  the  additional  Members  to  the
panel. I guess I want to ask him to expand on the K–12 education
and  how  important  it  is  to  have  students  as  prepared  as  these
young  students  look  like  apparently  are  going  to  be.  Can  you  give
us  a  little—and  what  you  think  about  what  you’ve  seen  today  in
Texarkana, Texas.
STATEMENT OF MR. THOMAS B. PICKENS, III, CEO, SPACEHAB
Mr.  PICKENS.  Thank  you,  Congressman.  As  the  CEO  of
SPACEHAB,  we  are  one  of  the  very  first,  I  think  we  are  the  first
commercial  provider  of  space-related  services  to  the  International
Space Station via the Space Shuttle.

In  reviewing  and  going  through  the  school  today,  I’ll  use  a  con-
temporary  term,  I  was  blown  away.  I  have  never  seen  anything
quite  like  this,  the  importance  of  it.  I  guess  the  part  that  really
caught  me  by  surprise,  and  very  sincerely  by  surprise,  was  the  ro-
botics lab. When we look at space and where we’re going and doing
in  space,  I  recognize  as  a  leader  of  this  company  SPACEHAB  that
that  is  really  the  future  of  engineering  if,  it’s  the  future  of  mathe-
matics,  it’s  the  future  of  science.  That  is  our  Magellan  trap  as  fu-
ture  generations  trek  forward.  To  see  these  youngsters  in  here
learning how to use robotics, I know because our analysis ended up
telling  us  so,  that  that  is  also  a  big  part  of  that  future  in  space.
The  radiation  problems  there  in  space  are  insurmountable.
They’re  almost  impossible  to  solve.  We’ll  probably  figure  it  out
somehow, but so far we haven’t. That means that robotics is going
to  do  most  of  everything  that  we  have  as  a  future  in  space.  The
work that was being done at the school was right in line with what
the future of space and space engineering is going to be.

Mr. HALL. Thank you.

DISCUSSION

Mr.  HALL.  I  yield  as  many  minutes  as  the  Chairman  would  like
to  have  to  make  any  inquiry  to  the  panel  or  Mr.  Pickens.  It’s  im-
portant  that  giants  in  the  industry  come  to  Texarkana,  Texas  to
see  what’s  happening  here  and  take  that  message  back  to  other
places you go. We thank you for your time which is very, very valu-
able,  and  Dr.  Stripling  for  your  trip  down  here  to  let  the  word  go
forth  as  to  what  you  see  here  and  what  people  can  do  when  they
forget  who  gets  the  credit  for  it  and  just  want  a  product  for  their
children  by  golly.  Thank  you  again  for  coming,  and  others  of  you
who  are  local  here,  you’re  on  the  job  day  in  and  day  out.  You’re
elected so you’re bound to be the best.

I  yield  five  minutes  to  the  Chairman.  By  golly,  every  now  and
then  he  holds  me  to  five  minutes  in  Washington.  I’m  going  to  put
the clock on him. If he goes over I won’t be too hard on him.

Chairman GORDON. Thank you, Mr. Hall. One of the things that
we learned from the report, Rising Above the Gathering Storm, was
really  disturbing,  and  that  is  that  approximately  63  percent  of  the
math teachers in our middle schools have neither a certification to
teach  math  or  a  major  in  math.  Ninety-three  percent  of  the  phys-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

47

ical  science  teachers  have  neither  that  certification  or  a  major,  so
it’s hard to teach a course and have passion in a course if you don’t
have  that  core  background,  no  matter  how  good  a  teacher  you
might be.

I  say  that  not  doubting  teachers.  My  mother  and  father  were
both  teachers.  My  father  was  a  farmer  and  after  World  War  II  he
went  to  school  on  the  G.I.  Bill.  Then  my  mother  was  working  at
the  cafeteria.  He  got  the  last  teaching  job  at  Smyrna  High  School
in our county.

We passed the COMPETES bill with an effort to try to take care
of  that.  Part  of  what  we  did  is  we  set  up  a  scholarship  for  those
students  that  would  go  into  math  or  science  and  education  and
agree to teach for five years. We also set up scholarships for teach-
ers like my father who would come back in the summers to get that
certification or AP or whatever it might be. And that’s good. I think
it’s  positive,  but  we  have  to  get  kids  interested  in  that  education
beforehand.  So,  Dr.  Marrett  I  know  that  NSF  is  doing  a  lot  of  re-
search  on  those  types  of  teaching  processes  and  professionalism,
but  what  are  you  doing  to  get  that  out  to  the  thousands  of  school
districts and schools all across this country?

Dr. MARRETT. We hope to do a lot more. A hearing like this helps
a  lot  as  we  both  can  explain  some  of  the  things  we  are  under-
taking, but also hear what else we need to be doing.

We have enhanced our efforts to explain and get more people in-
volved  in  STEM  education.  The  program  you  just  mentioned,  the
Noyce  Scholarship  Program  is  in  fact  a  program  that  takes  stu-
dents  during  their  undergraduate  years  who  are  majoring  in  the
STEM areas and seeks to attract them into the teaching profession.
That’s  been  a  very  interesting  and  successful  program.  We  could
certainly  have  more  places  asking  about  and  applying  to  that  pro-
gram  than  in  fact  takes  place  right  now.  So  we  are  seeking  to  en-
hance information about an effort like that.

We  also  have  a  program  at  the  graduate  level.  There  is  a  pro-
gram,  Graduate  Teaching  Fellows  for  K–12,  where  we  take  grad-
uate  students  who  are  in  the  STEM  areas  and  who  want  to  have
a  chance  to  work  with  K–12  teachers.  They  then  move  into  class-
rooms.  So,  what  we’ve  found  out  from  that  is  that  they  learn  a  lot
about  the  whole  teaching  experience,  about  the  challenges,  about
the opportunities.

In many respects we have a number of efforts underway in which
we would appreciate even more inquiries being made of us and sug-
gestions  about  new  efforts  or  the  ways  in  which  the  ones  we  are
undertaking  could  be  improved.  We  invite  at  all  times  comments
and suggestions about our portfolio.

Chairman GORDON. I think that’s one of our challenges, not only
to  create  these  programs,  but  as  we  all  know  the  tree  doesn’t  fall
if  you  don’t  hear  it.  Often  times  it’s  those  poorer  school  districts
that  are  the  ones  that  have  the  least  resources  to  be  able  to  find
that.

Also, Mr. Russell, when you were setting up this school here, you
were  able  to  cast  out  a  wide  net  and  bring  in  special  teachers.  As
you said, they were required to be master teachers. That’s fine and
good for here, but what about all the other schools? What are your

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

48

suggestions  on  how  we  can  raise  that  level  of  teacher  education  in
the schools that aren’t the model?

Mr.  RUSSELL.  I  think  it  is  the  most  critical  thing  because  we  all
know  a  nice  facility  like  this,  all  of  the  nice  supplies  and  cur-
riculum  is  wonderful,  but  we  also  know  the  most  important  thing
is  the  highly  qualified  classroom  teacher.  Bottom  line,  if  you  have
that  great-driven  teacher  with  passion,  they  can  be  in  an  import-
able  building  with  a  box  of  chalk  and  they  are  going  to  be  ex-
tremely  successful.  So,  that  is  key  number  one.  And  that’s  an  ini-
tiative  for  Texarkana  I.S.D.  We’re  not  limited  just  to  this  school.
Number  one,  we  pay  all  of  our  teachers  more  if  they  obtain  that
master certification. On top of that, we actually pay——

Chairman  GORDON.  That’s  master  certification  in  whatever

course? It could be history or whatever it is?

Mr.  RUSSELL.  Absolutely.  If  you  have  your  Master’s  degree,
you’re  on  a  higher  pay  scale.  Obviously  we  value  education  and
know  that  it  does  make  you  a  better  person  the  more  you  receive.
We also pay for the teachers to get their Master’s degree. We are
doing  20  to  25  a  year  in  the  district  where  they  enter  a  program
where  the  district  actually  pays  for  that  Master’s  program.  It  does
that  for  our  Morriss  teachers.  It  also  does  it  for  district  wide.  So
again,  that’s  just  a  great  length  to  great  teaching  that  we  have
seen.

Another  one,  the  great  partnership  with  Texas  A&M  and  Tex-
arkana.  They  actually  developed  a  curriculum  of  instruction  Mas-
ter’s  degree  just  for  the  department  of  the  school  district  and  then
added  this  Master  Mathematics  Certification  for  the  teachers  at
Morriss.

We  all  know  people  that  are  incredibly  smart  that  can’t  teach
very well, so not only are we teaching the teachers more about the
subject and experts on that, the University has also designed deliv-
ery  courses  so  when  they  have  that  higher  knowledge  they  can
bring it down to the students and make it successful. So we recog-
nize that as value added across the district, and that’s exactly what
we’re doing and would highly recommend that to anyone. Our mas-
ter teachers are the ones that typically stay in the district a longer
amount of time. They’re happier.

I  think  just  like  the  kids  sometimes  that  are  afraid  of  just  the
words  math  and  science  to  go  into  the  hard  subjects,  I  think  it’s
true  for  adults  too.  I  think  when  you  have  an  education  program
that  is  going  to  help  your  adults  get  more  comfortable  in  what
they’re teaching then you just see more success all the way around.

Chairman GORDON. Thank you.
Mr. HALL. I recognize Mr. Ross for five minutes. Mr. Ross.
Mr.  ROSS.  Thank  you.  Thank  you  Ranking  Member  Hall  and
Chairman  Gordon.  As  you  look  at  this  panel,  we’ve  got  someone
with NSA, we’ve got a school administrator, we’ve got someone as-
sociated  with  the  local  college,  a  manufacturer,  which  is  very  im-
portant, someone that’s in the space stuff, Mr. Pickens.

I  meant  to  say  this  in  my  opening  statement,  I  want  to  thank
David  Smedley  for  taking  time  out  of  the  classroom  to  be  with  us
today.  He  was  my  contribution  for  the  panel.  We’re  delighted  to
have  him  from  the  Arkansas  side.  As  Mr.  Hall  mentioned,  he’s  a
renowned  science  teacher  at  North  Heights  Junior  High  in  Tex-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

49

arkana, Arkansas, has a Bachelor’s and Master’s degree from Hen-
derson State University, which is also in my Congressional district
Arkadelphia, and has been in the field of science for 25 years.

One  of  the  things  that  I  think  is  important  to  know  is  that  this
year  he  was  named  North  Heights  Junior  High  School  teacher  of
the  year,  an  award  he  also  received  back  in  2003.  I  think  that
speaks  volumes  about  you  Mr.  Smedley  and  your  commitment  to
our  children.  If  you  were  a  Member  of  Congress,  and  I  hope  you
don’t want to be any time soon. If you were a Member of Congress,
what  are  one,  two  or  three  things  that  you  think  from  a  federal
level  that  we  could  do  to  try  and  help  provide  the  teachers  with
whatever  it  is  they  need  to  help  grow  a  new  generation  of
innovators  in  this  country  and  really  get  them  focused  on  the
maths and sciences?

Mr.  SMEDLEY.  Could  you  repeat  that  question?  Thank  you.
Thank  you.  I  think  that—I  don’t  know  if  it’s  actually  a  feasible
idea, but level the playing field. As I came to this school this morn-
ing and walked up here, I had to ask, ‘‘Is this a public school?’’ This
school  is  awesome,  but  it’s  not  the  public  school  that  the  majority
of our schools are. The majority of our schools are plagued with vio-
lence  and  drugs,  and  this  is  middle  school.  These  are  middle
schools,  but  resource  wise  if  we  could  just  level  the  playing  field,
the Texas side versus the Arkansas side.

I  was  raised  up  the  road  aways  and  didn’t  really  know  until  I
came down here the—it’s not—well, it’s not a rivalry, it’s not a ha-
tred,  but  it’s  a  very  strange  situation  that  goes  on  here  as  far  as
seeing the difference in resources between the two states.

Arkansas  is  a  wonderful  state  and  I  love  it  very  much,  but  to
think that if I were to come across the street and do the exact same
job  for  $5,000–$10,000  more,  money  is  an  enticement.  If  we  could
just level the playing field somehow as far as in numbers, resources
and pay, pay scale.

This  Internet  curriculum  that  I  suggested,  that  would—that
would  get  all  of  our  kids  on  the  same  page  at  the  same  level  as
far  as  science  content  goes.  I  really  feel  like  the  Federal  Govern-
ment’s—and again, I’m not sure of all the technicalities or whether
they could actually do it, but the Federal Government I think could
come in with a curriculum with activities.

There  is  a  company  called  Science  Education  Public  Under-
standing  Program  which  has  kits  for  each  content  area,  and  our
teachers  do  not  have  resources.  And  I  thank  God  that  I’m  not  in
that  portable  building  with  the  box  of  chalk  anymore.  I  was  there.
I was there, and I was the resource.

Resources and continual training and somehow level the playing
field  so  that  poorer  states  and  poorer  students  do  not—there  are
a  lot  of  students  and  scientist  that  we  are  losing  simply  because
they’re  poor  and  they  can’t  afford  to  go  to  college.  They  don’t  have
that  privilege  or  that  honor.  They  didn’t  get  that  scholarship  they
needed,  or  one  thing  or  another  happened.  Level  the  playing  field
between  the  states  and  encourage  the  teachers  to  continue  their
trainings to stay up to date.

Science,  you  know,  it  changes  so  fast  nowadays.  I  tell  my  stu-
dents  in  the  classroom  what  was  science  fiction  when  I  was  their
age is science fact today. I try to inspire them into futuristic think-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

50

ing  and  say  what  is  your  science  fiction  today  that  you  dream
might be science fact tomorrow.

So, those things that I think you could do, level the playing field,

continual training. Thank you.

Mr. ROSS. I see the red light Mr. Chairman, so I assume my time

is up.

Mr. HALL. I kept in mind that you would have the gavel over the

entire Congress. I will let you go as long as you wanted to.

I looked at Dr. Marrett when I thanked Dr. Stripling a while ago
for  coming  so  far.  I  had  Dr.  Stripling  on  my  mind.  I  was  going  to
ask her some questions. I apologize to one of you if—I looked at one
and  was  thinking  about  the  other  one.  That  happens  a  lot  to  guys
my age.

As a matter of fact, can I take time to tell a story Mr. Chairman?
Show  you  how  people  can  make  mistakes.  There  was  a  Michigan
woman and her family vacationing in a small community one time
where  Paul  Newman  and  his  family  often  visited.  One  Sunday
morning  the  woman  got  up  early  to  take  a  long  walk,  and  after  a
brisk five-mile hike she decided to treat herself to a double dipped
chocolate  ice  cream  cone.  She  hopped  in  the  car  and  went  straight
to  the  combination  bakery  ice  cream  parlor.  There  was  only  one
other patron in the store, Paul Newman sitting at the counter hav-
ing a doughnut and coffee.

The woman’s heart skipped a beat as her eyes made contact with
those  famous  baby  blue  eyes.  The  actor  nodded  graciously  and  the
star-struck  woman  smiled.  Pull  yourself  together  she  said  to  her-
self.  You’re  a  happily  married  woman  with  three  children.  You’re
45 years old, not a teenager.

The  clerk  filled  her  order  and  she  took  the  double  dipped  choco-
late ice cream cone in one hand and her change in the other. Then
she  went  out  the  door  avoiding  a  glance  in  Paul  Newman’s  direc-
tion.  When  she  reached  her  car  she  realized  she  had  a  handful  of
change,  but  her  other  hand  was  empty.  Where  is  my  ice  cream
cone? Did I leave it in the store?

Back in the store she went, expecting to see the cone still in the
clerk’s  hand  or  in  a  holder  on  the  counter  or  something.  No  ice
cream  cone  was  in  sight.  With  that  she  happened  to  look  over  at
Paul Newman. His face broke into his familiar warm friendly grin.
He  said  to  the  woman,  ‘‘You  put  it  in  your  purse.’’  So  I  know—Dr.
Marrett,  I  know  you’re  not  Dr.  Stripling,  by  golly.  I’m  thankful
you’re not. I’m thankful both of you are here. We’ve got two of you.
I’m  going  to  exceed  the  five  minutes  just  a  little  bit,  but  Dr.
Stripling  I  want  to  ask  you,  what’s  the  status  of  the  think  tank
that  you  all  are  involved  in  with  in  UT–Dallas,  Baylor,  Princeton,
and Texas State on replicating models like Morris?

Dr.  STRIPLING.  Well,  I’m  glad  you  asked  that  question  because
the group is coming to Texarkana I believe next Friday. First of all,
let  me  describe  that.  A  couple  years  ago  Texarkana  I.S.D.  leader-
ship,  representatives  from  A&M–Texarkana,  Princeton  University,
University  of  Texas–Dallas,  Baylor  University  and  Texas  State
Technical  College  started  coming  together,  and  really  it  is  a  tree
think tank. That is the agenda each time.

We first—well, I don’t think I participated in the very first meet-
ing,  but  we  were  in  Waco  one  time.  We  were  at  TSTC  at  Baylor.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

51

The  group  came  here  last  fall.  The  whole  effort  of  this  group  is  to
think  about,  really  as  a  think  tank  would,  how  we  can  replicate
models  similar  to  the  collaboration  here  in  Texarkana  and  other
sides.  I  know  Dr.  Hensley  is  actually  planning  to  have  an  Ohio
Texas  STEM  meeting  at  the  University  of  Texas–Dallas  in  mid-
May, I believe. So, that’s the status, we’re moving along.

Mr.  HALL.  Have  you—are  you  familiar  with  the  You  Teach  pro-

gram at the University of Texas?

question.

Dr. STRIPLING. Yes, I am.
Mr.  HALL.  Have  y’all  considered  reaching  out  to  them  maybe  to
be a part of this think tank and the Texas A&M and the University
of  Texas  work  together  on  something  together  like  that  possibly?
Dr.  STRIPLING.  I  think  we  probably  could.  This  is  not  a  closed
door  group  at  all.  We  are  willing  to  take  anyone  who  is  willing  to
jump in as a collaborative partner and work toward this end.

Mr.  HALL.  Good.  And  I  thank  you.  I  want  to  ask  Mr.  Pickens  a

A  lot  of  family,  I  guess  many,  many  families  across  this  country
live in hope that their cures have eluded all of us for centuries. We
more  than  hope.  We  have  prayers.  We  also  have  one  other  thing.
We  have  people  and  men  and  women  that  are  doing  research  that
are  hammering  for  breakthroughs.  I  guess  my  question  to  you  is,
do  we  have  any  reason  to  believe  that  through  your  leadership  at
SPACEHAB  and  after  listening  to  your  wonderful  speech  at  noon
today, is there hope for those of us who have diabetes, Alzheimer’s,
cancer, Lou Gehrig’s disease. I have in my family progressive super
nuclear palsy for which there is no cure. Is there hope for us in the
work you’re doing at this time? If so, take the rest of my time and
tell us about it because we want to hear that.

Mr.  PICKENS.  Congressman,  I  wish  I  had  a  whole  day  to  talk
about  this.  This  is  the  most  passionate  thing  I’ve  ever  run  across
in my life. When I got into SPACEHAB I was a board member, and
I maneuvered myself as to become the CEO for just exactly the rea-
son that you’re pointing out.

When I looked at it, SPACEHAB had been sending up science for
23 years on behalf of NASA and I saw five and a half billion dollars
of  money  that  had  been  spent  through  that  whole  process  of  send-
ing  science  to  space.  When  President  Reagan  in  1984  first  dis-
cussed with the Nation about the idea of building an international
space nation, the intent and the desire at the time in a 1984 State
of the Union address was to enhance and save lives on Earth. That
International  Space  Station  will  be  complete  in  two  years.  In  the
meantime,  Congress  has  made  sure  that  NASA  has  set  science  up
in  preparation  for  that  date  of  completion  of  2010  for  the  ISS  and
made  them  send  things  up  to  observe  what  it  was  like  in  micro-
gravity and the differences that it would be like here on Earth.

In  that,  the  comparison  ended  up  showing  very  definitely  there
is  a  lot  of  value.  The  value  came  in  two  big  areas,  and  there  are
other  areas.  I  apologize  if  I  leave  out  some  of  those  areas  people
feel  passionate  towards.  But  the  one  big  area  is  vaccines.  You  can
grow  a  vaccine  in  a  petri  dish  here  on  Earth,  and  you  can  try  and
try  and  you  can  try  for  years  and  years  and  years  and  years  and
you’ll  never  get  anywhere.  And  yet,  we  just  flew  the  salmonella
vaccine that will end up enhancing and saving lives on Earth, just

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

52

exactly what President Reagan intended in the very beginning, the
stages of the ISS intended.

The other area is what’s called protein crystal growth. I won’t go
into what all that means, but it’s a very complex system of how you
develop  a  drug  that  will  treat  something  that  is  as  sinister  and  is
as  hard  to  decipher  as  diabetes,  Parkinson’s,  Lou  Gehrig’s,  sickle
cell  anemia,  you  name  it.  That’s  the  tough  stuff.  The  things  that
we  haven’t  solved,  the  things  that  we  haven’t  gone  any  forward,
nothing  has  happened  if  you  think  about  it.  What  has  really
changed  with  millions  and  millions  if  not  billions  of  dollars  that
have been spent in those areas of drug discovery that we can really
point to? Nothing. There are some treatments on the edges of mak-
ing  people  feel—I  think  Parkinson’s  has  had  some  advancements
lately,  but  it’s  really  kind  of  slowed  it  down;  hasn’t  really  treated
it. In space they find out that they can do that.

Now,  NASA  has  been  building  space  stations.  They  have  been
also  doing  some  science.  I  give  the  analogy  that  to  do  an  experi-
ment  in  space  up  to  now  while  they  were  building  the  station  was
like doing open heart surgery on the back of a bulldozer in the mid-
dle  of  a  construction  site  building  a  sky  scraper.  If  you  went  into
a  construction  engineer  and  said  I’m  going  to  go  do  some  open
heart  surgery  in  your  construction  site  he  would  tell  you  that
you’re  crazy.  And  that’s  where  we’ve  been  doing  science  today.
They  have  done  a  pretty  good  job  of  it  though,  and  they  found  out
that there was a lot of opportunity for value to bring down and en-
hance  and  save  lives  on  Earth,  but  it  wasn’t  in  the  right  type  of
atmosphere  and  the  right  type  of  conditions  to  really  get  the  best
you  could  possibly  get  so  I  think  that’s  where  we’re  headed  in
SPACEHAB is to go off and develop those and discover those. And
I think there is a huge amount of opportunity in those areas, Con-
gressman.

Mr.  HALL.  I  thank  you.  My  time’s  up,  or  I  would  have  a  follow-

up for you. Mr. Chairman, do you have—go for it.

Chairman  GORDON.  I  just  have  one  quick  question  for  Mr.  Pick-
ens.  You  have  become  involved  through  STEM  education  through
your STARS program. Any lessons learned there you want to share
with us?

Mr.  PICKENS.  The  STARS  program  is  where  we  involve  children
from all over the world. As a matter of fact, mostly from the United
States to send experiments up in our SPACEHAB science modules.
They’re  no  longer  flying  the  science  modules  any  longer.  With  the
construction  of  the  International  Space  Station  being  the  primary
importance of the Shuttles right now, there is no room.

There  is  discussion,  however,  that  they  would  extend  flights  of
the Shuttle that would include the science module, and I would en-
courage  that  because  that  is  waiting.  There  are  lots  of  kids  with
experience who were approved by NASA. They are ready to fly and
they  are  very,  very  interested  in  doing  that.  It  really  brings  the
kids into the game.

I was watching on the ISS the other day where they had a micro-
phone and they were talking to some of the astronauts up there to
the students down on the ground, and it was great, and it was fine,
but  if  they  had  experiments  up  there,  that  would  be  really,  really
great.  If  they  had  had  robotics  up  there  that  they  control  on  the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

53

International  Space  Station  with  cameras  on  it,  that  would  be  in-
credibly  great.  That’s  where  we  need  to  go  with  this  ISS  facility
that we’ve spent a hundred billion dollars on.

Chairman  GORDON.  Thank  you.  If  you’ll  back  the  balance  of  my

time.

Mr. HALL. Mr. Ross.
Mr.  ROSS.  Dr.  Marrett,  thank  you  for  joining  us  here  today.  Do
you  believe  that  we’re  doing  a  good  job  of  getting  resources?  Mr.
Smedley  talked  about  hands-on  materials  to  work  with  the  stu-
dents. I know NSF has some programs where they can provide ma-
terials,  grants  for  equipment.  Are  we  doing  as  good  a  job  as  we
should  be,  or  what  should  we  be  doing  different  to  try  and  get
those materials and those grant opportunities out and to the public
schools  and  get  more  math  and  science  teachers  aware  that  they
exist?

I know I came back inspired by some of the work NSF was doing
at  the  South  Pole,  and  I  put  together  a  package  to  send  to  science
teachers in my district, but are we doing a good enough job of get-
ting  that  information  and  that  knowledge  from  Washington  to  the
school  districts  across  the  country  to  try  to  help  grow  a  new  gen-
eration  of  mathematicians  and  scientist?  What  could  we  be  doing
differently?

Dr. MARRETT. Our answer in terms of are we doing enough is no,
we’re  not.  I  do  have  some  ideas  about  some  other  things  that  we
should  be  undertaking  and  undertaking  collectively.  It’s  not  just
the National Science Foundation.

We’re  working  collaboratively  with  other  federal  agencies.  We
need  to  be  a  much  stronger  connection  with  a  number  of  founda-
tions and other places. We’re working with all of these institutions.
I do want to thank you, however, for your comments that you made
about the experiences at the South Pole. As you know, the National
Science Foundation operates the set of activities in Antarctica, and
we’ve seen what a difference it makes as students learn a lot about
what’s  taking  place  on  the  continent  that  few  people  know  very
much about.

Let me illustrate with a little side story. There is a teacher from
Harlem who will be going in the next season to Antarctica. She de-
scribes  what  this  has  meant  to  her  students  in  her  middle  school
science  class.  They  began  to  have  a  great  deal  more  interest  in
questions about climate, questions about what the world is like be-
cause  they  suddenly  had  a  connection  with  someone  who  would  be
pursuing the topics of interest to them, generating that kind of in-
terest.  We  found  what  that  kind  of  activity  can  mean.  I  just  want
to  thank  you  for  bringing  this  possibility  to  our  attention,  by  your
reference to the South Pole.

In  terms  of  the  kinds  of  activities  where  other  resources  can  be
developed,  within  the  National  Science  Foundation,  we’re  really
working  more  to  see  how  to  bring  the  activities  together.  I  happen
to  be  in  charge  of  the  Directorate  for  Education  and  Human  Re-
sources.  There  are  seven  other  directories  that  are  very  much  con-
cerned  with  developments  in  the  disciplinary  areas.  Everyone  of
the  Directorates  has  education  programs,  outreach  programs,  and
often  are  looking  for  effective  ways  to  work  with  schools,  to  work
with  museums.  Our  task  then  becomes  to  work  in  collaborative

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

54

ways  so  that  we’ve  got  some  cohesive  materials  and  ideas  that  we
can share, but we also have to listen to know what are the contex-
tual conditions. A key question: What are the circumstances under
which materials and ideas can be used most effectively?

I  want  to  thank  the  panelist  and  Mr.  Smedley  in  particular  for
drawing  attention  to  how  whatever  we  do  it  will  have  to  be  in  the
context of the real world in which teachers, students and others are
operating.

Chairman  GORDON.  Mike,  if  you  would  yield  just  a  quick  mo-
ment.  The  Science  and  Technology  Committee  has  voted  our
website is the best website in the House of Representatives as well
as  the  Senate.  One  thing  we  tried  to  do  there  is  put  in  links  to
NASA,  to  NSF,  to  every  group  that  we  could  where  we  could  find
lesson plans, we could find any type of a link to education from all
levels. So, I would suggest that those of you in administrative posi-
tions 
is
www.science.house.gov. It really is a central location for a lot of in-
formation.

communicate 

that.  And 

Mr. HALL. Thank you.
Mr.  Leherr,  let  me  ask  you  this  question.  We’re  interested  in
youngsters  here  today  obviously.  That’s  what  this  is  all  about.
You’re  with  Alcoa.  You  all  do  have  intern  opportunities  for  high
school students, do you not?

Mr. LEHERR. Currently no, we don’t. We’re not allowed to employ
folks  under  the  age  of  18.  We  do  have  intern  opportunities  though
for college age.

Mr.  HALL.  Would  you  offer  local  scholarships  to  students  who
were interested in studies that might fit your company or might be
good  students  to  work  for  your  company  upon  finishing  internship
and  then  getting  their  education  here  at  Texas  A&M–Texarkana?
Mr.  LEHERR.  Congressman  Hall,  you’re  putting  me  on  the  spot,

elsewhere 

and 

it’s 

but I think definitely smart business leaders here——

Mr.  HALL.  Chamber  of  Commerce  told  me  to  put  that  last  part.
Mr. LEHERR. I think smart business leaders would not only offer
scholarships and internships and be part of the university and the
STEM  education.  Obviously,  somebody  that  employs  a  lot  of  engi-
neers,  I  think  there  is  one  football  coach  that  has  a  bunch  of  blue
chips year after year.

Mr.  HALL.  I  thank  you.  I  have  one  other  question  for—if  Mr.

Chairman will allow me—to Mr. Russell.

Mr. Russell, we were worried about students who get well-round-
ed  education  not  going  into  math  and  science.  That’s  across  the
country,  that’s  the  fear.  Everybody’s  talking  about  it.  We’re  trying
to  encourage  them,  tell  them  how  wonderful  it  is  and  try  to  get
them in there.

Now,  you  all  have  gone  to  great  extents  to  entice  them,  and
you’ve enticed them. Now, that you’ve got them, how do you ensure
that  the  students  at  Morriss  Elementary  are  receiving  a  quality,
well-rounded  education  incorporating  non-science  and  math  sub-
jects where they won’t be math and science nerds? Is there any bet-
ter way to ask it?

Mr.  RUSSELL.  No.  That  is  an  excellent  way.  In  fact,  Ms.  Morriss
asked  that  question  before  she  would  allow  us  to  put  her  name  on
the building and we had to beg her to allow her to do that, because

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

55

she has quite a passion in the fine arts and again would not allow
her  name  on  a  building  that  did  not  take  great  strides  to  do  that.
If  you  will  look  at  the  stage  that  you’re  sitting  on  right  now  and
all  the  lights  and  the  sound  equipment,  if  I  could  talk  all  of  you
into  coming  back  to  the  next  program  of  the  students  here  in  the
fine arts you would see that that is very important here.

It’s  just  more  of  a  flare  that  we  may  in  some  of  the  programs
that  the  kids  are  putting  on,  the  dramas,  the  plays,  the  musicals,
you may see a science and engineering flare to it, but all those pro-
grams are so important, especially at the early ages. As you heard,
we’re  taking  our  academy  approach  to  sixth  grade  at  the  middle
school next year then moving up. All of the academies are designed
to where if you don’t like the science and engineering this year, the
health science or the fine arts or leadership you can switch to next
and still be on line.

The  math  will  be  one  of  the  toughest  ones  because  we  are  ad-
vancing  our  math  courses  to  where  you  will  actually  be  ready  for
calculus  by  11th  grade  so  you  can  have  Dr.  Green’s  engineering
classes  in  12th.  We’re  really  designing  everything  all  the  way  Pre-
K  through  16.  So  as  the  kids’  interest  change  they  can  flow  be-
tween  academies  and  still  be  okay.  So,  while  we  are  concentrating
more  and  have  much  more  of  a  flare,  it’s  not  at  age  five  you’re  all
of  a  sudden  deciding  what  you  want  to  be  at  23  and  you’re  locked
in and hurt and not well rounded otherwise.

Mr.  HALL.  Okay.  I  thank  you.  Do  you  have  other  questions  Mr.

Ross or Mr. Chairman?

Chairman GORDON. Mr. Hall, I just want to thank you for pulling
this  hearing  together.  It’s  been  very  informative  for  all  of  us.  I
thank Texarkana, both Texas and Arkansas for the hospitality you
have  shown  us  while  we’ve  been  here.  Hopefully  we  can  take  back
some of these lessons learned and help other communities.

Mr. HALL. I want to thank everyone, all the witnesses who testi-
fied  before  the  Committee  today.  This  has  been  a  highly  edu-
cational  hearing  for  everyone  here.  Our  witnesses  have  given  this
community  a  lot  to  consider.  I  also  would  like  to  once  again  thank
the Committee Chairman Mr. Gordon for making the trip to Texas,
and  to  Mr.  Ross  for  joining  us  on  this  side  of  town.  We  all  have
gratitude  for  Marjorie  Chandler,  my  office  and  my  district  staff,
and  Tina  Veal  Gooch  with  the  Texarkana  Independent  School  Dis-
trict for all of her hard work, and Bess Caughran for accompanying
the Chairman here and keeping his books straight and writing out
questions and intelligent things for him to say.

So, if there is no objection, the record will remain open for addi-
tional statements from the Members and for answers to any follow-
up questions. The Committee may ask of the witnesses without ob-
jection. It is flat so ordered. Hearing is now adjourned.

May  I  have  one  exception.  If  you’ll  all  sit  back  down  I  just  want
to  ask  you  to  do  one  thing.  I’d  like  for  you  two  folks  to  stand  up
back there. Josh and Martha, please stand up.

[Whereupon, at 2:53 p.m., the Committee was adjourned.]

Æ

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 20:20 Sep 09, 2008 Jkt 042122 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\051208\42122 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

